<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89703-0078 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.7-03-89.f2.A1077</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 126 / Monday, July 3, 1989 / Notices<ITAG tagnum="52">ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[OPP_36168; FRL 3611-11] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Endangered Species Protection Program </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY:</T2> Environmental Protection Agency (EPA).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION:</T2> Notice of Proposed program. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY:</T2> This Notice summarizes EPA's revised proposed EndangeredSpecies Protection Program (Program). The Program includes a new approachto biological consultation and a revised implementation plan, includinga voluntary Interim Program. This Notice also provides background informationregarding EPA's development of the Program since 1987.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATE:</T2> Comments in response to this Notice must be received onor before October 2, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESSES:</T2> Written comments identified by the document controlnumber OPP-36168 should be submitted in triplicate to: Public Docket andFreedom of Information Section, Field Operations Division (H7506-C), Officeof Pesticide Programs, Environmental Protection Agency, 401 M St., SW.,Washington, DC 20460. In person, bring comments to: Rm. 236, CM andplusmin;2, 1921 Jefferson DavisHighway, Arlington, VA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2> By mail:<ITAG tagnum="15">Larry Turner, Ecological Effects Branch, Environmental Fate and EffectsDivision (H7507-C), Office of Pesticide Programs, Environmental ProtectionAgency, 40l M St., SW., Washington, DC 20460.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Office location and telephone number: Rm. 815, CM andplusmin;2, 1921Jefferson Davis Highway, Arlington, VA (703-557-1007).</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:</T2> This Notice is organized into severalunits. Unit I is the introduction, which provides information on legalauthority, the consultation process, and the initial development of theEndangered Species Protection Program, as well as a summary of the <T4>Federal Register</T4> (FR) Notice published on March 9, 1988. ThatFR Notice described EPA's proposed Program and solicited public commentson a number of issues related to the Endangered Species Protection Program.Unit II provides a summary of the development of the Program since January1988 and includes the role of EPA, the states, and other agencies, particularlythe U.S. Department of Agriculture (USDA) and U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service(FWS) of the Department of the Interior. Unit II also provides a summaryof the role of the Interagency Task Groups that have been formed to assistEPA in developing the Endangered Species Protection Program, as well asa summary of their primary tasks. The revised proposed Program is summarizedin Unit III, including the new approach to biological consultation anda revised implementation plan. Exemptions from the Program and informationregarding public health emergencies and enforcement of the Program areprovided in this Unit as well. Unit IV contains an analysis of public comments,and Unit V provides a summary of the voluntary Interim Program, which includespilot programs and education and outreach efforts. Unit VI provides additionaltechnical background information, and Unit VII discusses information relatedto the public record and solicitation of public comments. Finally, UnitVIII provides the references cited throughout the Notice. Each Unit, asappropriate, includes information regarding the role of the public in variousaspects of the proposed Program. <ITAG tagnum="84">I. Background </ITAG>A. Legal Authority The Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act (FIFRA), as amended(7 U.S.C. 135 <T3>et seq.</T3>) governs the regulation of pesticides in the United States.Under FIFRA, a pesticide product may be sold or distributed in the UnitedStates only if it is registered or exempted from registration by EPA. Beforea product can be registered unconditionally, it must be shown that thepesticide can be used without ``unreasonable adverse effect on the environment''(FIFRA section 3(c)(5)), that is, without causing ``any unreasonable riskto man or the environment, taking into account the economic, social, andenvironmental costs and benefits of the use of the pesticide'' (FIFRA section2(bb)), when used in accordance with label directions. Congress passed the Endangered Species Act of 1973, as amended (16 U.S.C.153l <T3>et seq.</T3>) (ESA), to provide protection for animal and plant speciesthat are threatened or endangered of becoming extinct and to conserve theecosystems upon which they depend. (Such threatened or endangered speciesare referred to as listed species in this document.) The ESA institutescertain prohibitions against the ``taking'' of listed species of plantsand animals. Section 7 of the ESA (15 U.S.C. 1536) requires all Federal agencies toensure that any action authorized, funded or carried out by the agencywill not be likely to jeopardize the continued existence of a listed speciesor to result in the destruction or adverse modification of the criticalhabitat of a listed species. This duty extends to licensing activities,such as the registration of pesticides by EPA. In other words, EPA in registeringpesticides must ensure that its actions do not harm listed species.The FWS is the Federal agency responsible for administering the ESA formost species. However, the National Marine Fisheries Service (NMFS) ofthe Department of Commerce also administers the ESA and is responsiblefor protecting listed marine species. USDA's Animal, Plant and Health InspectionService has some enforcement responsibility for the import/export of terrestrialplants under ESA and under the Convention on International Trade in EndangeredSpecies of Wild Fauna and Flora. In 1988, both FIFRA and ESA were amended. The amendments to FIFRA do notcontain any explicit references to EPA's Endangered Species ProtectionProgram. However, the ESA amendments (Pub. L. 100-478; 102 U.S.C. 2306)directly address EPA and its activities affecting pesticides. The ESA amendmentsrequire that EPA work jointly with USDA and the U.S. Department of theInterior to identify appropriate alternatives for implementing a labelingprogram to protect listed species from pesticides, while allowing agriculturalfood and fiber commodity production to continue. The ESA amendments requireEPA to investigate the best available methods to develop maps, alternativesto mapping, and to identify alternatives to prohibitions on pesticide use.The ESA Amendments also require EPA to inform and educate fully those engagedin agricultural production of the elements of any proposed pesticide labelingprogram and to provide an opportunity to comment on the elements of sucha program. B. ESA Consultation Process Briefly, the consultation process under ESA begins when a Federal agencymakes a determination that its authorized or funded action, in EPA's caseregistration and reregistration of pesticides, may affect a listed speciesor its critical habitat (``may affect'' determination) and requests a BiologicalOpinion from FWS. To comply with EPA's responsibilities under section 7of ESA, EPA conducts an assessment of the potential effects of pesticideson listed species. If EPA determines that a particular pesticide use ``mayaffect'' a listed species, EPA initiates a formal consultation under section7 of ESA. Generally, these consultations have been with FWS because mostpesticide uses do not affect listed species under NMFS jurisdiction, suchas whales, seals, and other marine animals. In response to an agency's ``may affect`` determination, FWS develops aBiological Opinion on that action. A Biological Opinion regarding a pesticideindicates whether the use of the pesticide in question is likely to jeopardizethe continued existence of a listed species or destroy or adversely impacta listed species' critical habitat. The Biological Opinion may containreasonable and prudent alternatives and measures. Reasonable and prudentalternatives are actions which (1) the consulting agency is capable ofimplementing under its authority and jurisdiction, (2) are economicallyand technologically feasible, and (3) could avoid the likelihood of jeopardyto listed species or avoid the destruction or adverse modification of criticalhabitat. In addition, the FWS may include reasonable and prudent measures if anincidental take statement is provided in the Biological Opinion. (Incidentaltake is the inadvertent killing, harming, or removal of federally listedspecies that results from carrying out an otherwise lawful activity, suchas the use of a pesticide in accordance with label directions.) If incidentaltake is specified, reasonable and prudent measures will be provided toreduce the likelihood of incidental take. Incidental take and the associatedreasonable and prudent measures may be specified for species regardlessof whether or not FWS has declared jeopardy for the species. If the Federal agency cannot comply with the Biological Opinion, it mayapply for an exemption under ESA to be considered by the Endangered SpeciesCommittee which is composed of the Secretaries of Agriculture, Army, andthe Interior; Administrators of EPA and the National Oceanic and AtmosphericAdministration; the Chairman of the Council of Economic Advisors; and representativesfrom each affected state who are appointed by the President of the UnitedStates, as appropriate. Regulations governing section 7 consultation proceduresare described in 50 CFR Part 402. Unit VI.A. provides a summary of theprocedures for complying with section 7 consultation requirements. C. Initial Development of the Endangered Species Protection Program The EPA began developing the Endangered Species Protection Program in 1982because the approach that EPA had been using to comply with the ESA hadbeen criticized as inadequate. The EPA's consultations were conducted onlyon individual registration actions that were submitted to EPA, which resultedin a case-by-case approach. This approach was slow and generally did notconsider older and often more toxic pesticides. Since newer pesticideswere being reviewed routinely as part of the registration process, newerpesticides were more likely to be referred to FWS than older pesticides.This resulted in inadequate protection for listed species. Also, the case-by-caseapproach resulted in market inequity among registrants of different pesticidesfor the same uses. Consequently, EPA in cooperation with FWS developed the ``cluster'' approachto requesting consultations, in which all pesticides registered for thesame use pattern were addressed at the same time. Each pesticide in a clusterwas evaluated independently for its toxicity and expected exposure to listedspecies. The individual evaluations were grouped together and referredto FWS for consultation as a cluster. The purpose of this approach wasto accelerate the review of a larger number of pesticides that could affectlisted species, to treat new and old pesticides consistently, and to eliminatemarket inequities by reviewing pesticides with similar uses as one group.After EPA received Biological Opinions for certain pesticides includedin the initial cluster consultations, EPA intended to implement the reasonableand prudent alternatives identified by FWS for these pesticides by usingpesticide product labeling and county-specific Pesticide Use Bulletinsfor Protection of Endangered Species (Bulletins). The Bulletins would containhabitat maps and would describe pesticide use limitations within the habitatof listed species. However, EPA encountered difficulties in acquiring accuratemaps and map information and also received many comments from other Federalagencies, states, and users regarding the overall approach. Criticism aboutthe lack of public involvement also was raised. The EPA concluded thatmore time was required to develop the Endangered Species Protection Programand that public comment on the proposed Program was needed. The EPA issueda FR Notice on March 9, 1988, (53 FR 7716) which described EPA's proposedProgram and requested comment. The EPA also held public meetings acrossthe country to obtain additional comments. D. Summary of the March 9, 1988, FR Notice On March 9, 1988, EPA issued a FR Notice (53 FR 7716) requesting publiccomment on the Endangered Species Protection Program described in thatNotice, as well as on alternative approaches that would protect listedspecies from jeopardy resulting from the use of pesticides. The proposedEndangered Species Protection Program described in the March 9, 1988, FRNotice, which is superseded by the revised proposed Endangered SpeciesProtection Program set forth in this Notice, is discussed in the UnitsI.D.1. through 6. 1. <T3>Cluster approach. </T3>The EPA originally proposed an Endangered SpeciesProtection Program based on the cluster approach to consultations, as opposedto the case-by-case approach that had been previously used. The EPA proposedto evaluate all pesticides registered for a particular use and to referat one time to FWS for a Biological Opinion, those for which a ``may affect''determination was made. The EPA had completed reviews and received Biological Opinions for clustersencompassing pesticides used on selected crops (corn, soybeans, cotton,sorghum, oats, barley, wheat and rye); in forests; as mosquito larvicides;and on rangeland or pasture land. Under this approach, additional use patternswould have been evaluated until all pesticide/listed species combinationswere addressed. 2. <T3>Exemptions. </T3>The proposed Program would have exempted home andgarden uses and certain forestry uses. The FR Notice also indicated thatunder ESA, pests identified by the Department of the Interior to presentan overriding risk to man would not be eligible for listing under the ESA.3. <T3>Labeling/bulletins. </T3>The EPA's proposed Program relied on the labelingof affected pesticides to instruct users that they must comply with thelimitations on use, as identified in the Bulletins. In May 1987, EPA issuedPesticide Registration (PR) Notices 87-4 and 87-5, which indicated thatin order to remain in compliance with FIFRA, all registrants of pesticideproducts identified in the clusters as causing jeopardy to listed speciesmust modify their product labeling to provide pesticide users with theinformation necessary to protect listed species. Specifically, labels would list the counties in which use limitations appliedand would refer users to the Bulletins for the county in which the productwas to be used, or labels would provide the user with a FWS telephone numberto obtain further information. The Bulletins also would contain a map ofthe county identifying the area in which there were pesticide use limitationsto protect listed species. 4. <T3>State-initiated plans. </T3>In October 1987, EPA invited states todevelop alternative plans to protect listed species. These plans couldinclude changes in pesticide application rates, timing, methods, or anyother measures that would protect listed species and would be subject tothe approval of both EPA and FWS. These state-initiated plans would provideEPA with recommendations to achieve compliance with the ESA in the stateand would reduce the potential adverse impact on the user community withinthat state. 5. <T3>Program deferral. </T3>When PR Notices 87-4 and 87-5 were issued, EPAintended that the labeling approach would take effect in the 1988 growingseason. However, it became clear that implementation of the EndangeredSpecies Protection Program would be far more complex and time-consumingthan originally anticipated. Public response to the draft maps and to theproposed Program in general indicated a number of significant concerns,such as map inaccuracies, the need for more public review and comment onthe Program, the necessity for additional education and training programs,and others. Also, the development of state-initiated plans would requirecoordination and cooperation among several groups, which would take time.Therefore, EPA announced on January 7, 1988, that it was deferring implementationof the Endangered Species Protection Program for the 1988 growing season.For registrants, EPA issued PR Notice 88-1 on January 26, 1988, which rescindedPR Notices 87-4 and 87-5. Deferral of the Program was in keeping with Congressional action. In passingthe 1988 Continuing Appropriations Bill, Congress blocked expendituresprior to September 15, 1988, of EPA funds to implement or to enforce theEndangered Species Protection Program. 6. <T3>Request for public comment. </T3>In the FR Notice (53 FR 7718) EPAinvited public comment on any aspect of the Program and invited participationin public meetings to be held across the country. The FR Notice identifiedseveral major areas on which comments were of particular interest. Theseareas included identifying alternatives to use prohibitions to precludejeopardy to listed species; evaluating the appropriateness of an approachbased on clusters, maps, and product labels; assuring consistency betweenpesticide-specific and use-cluster Biological Opinions that declared jeopardy;maintaining consistency with other Federal programs involved with pesticideuse; providing assistance to non-traditional user groups; and providingguidelines or minimum requirements for state-initiated plans recommendingalternative measures.<ITAG tagnum="84">II. Development of the Program Since January 1988 </ITAG>A. The Role of EPA Since deferral of the Endangered Species Protection Program, the Officeof Pesticide Programs (OPP) within EPA has continued work to identify listedspecies that may be harmed by pesticide use and to develop the Program.As part of this effort, EPA has reviewed the public comments and consideredthem in revising the Program. To ensure that the maps describing the habitatof listed species are accurate and reflect currently occupied habitat,EPA has been working closely with other Federal agencies and the statesin revising the maps. To assist in developing the Program, EPA has formedInteragency Task Groups with USDA and FWS. The EPA also has continued toconsult with FWS on pesticide registrations and reregistration actions.To date, EPA has submitted over 65 pesticide/use specific (case-by-case)consultation requests, along with consultation requests on groups of pesticidesregistered for use on corn, cotton, soybeans, sorghum, wheat, oats, barley,rye, forests, rangeland, noncropland, and as aquatic herbicides and mosquitolarvicides. The EPA's Regional Offices serve as lead liaisons to states developingstate-initiated plans and have been working very closely with these andother states, as well as the Indian Tribes. In addition, Regional Offices will be working with the Commonwealths ofPuerto Rico and the Northern Mariana Islands, the Virgin Islands, Guam,American Samoa, the Federated States of Micronesia, and the Republics ofthe Marshall Islands and of Palau. These areas were not originally includedin the Program because the cluster consultations did not reveal any listedspecies that were jeopardized from the use of pesticides in these areas.However, recent Biological Opinions have included listed species in someof these areas. The EPA will therefore develop the appropriate maps andBulletins and will invite development of plans to protect listed species.Other Regional Office activities include holding public meetings and beinginvolved in coordination of map reviews and outreach efforts. RegionalOffices also have been involved by providing input and reviewing variousaspects of the Program. In addition, the Regional Offices have been identifyingthe states which will participate in pilot programs described in Unit Vof this document and will be involved with the evaluation of these pilotprograms. The EPA is preparing to do an economic impact analysis with the assistanceof USDA and FWS. In developing this analysis, EPA is gathering pesticideusage and crop location data, as well as information on the location ofthe habitats of listed species, to develop several case studies. Sincethe proposed Program is intended to protect listed species and still beresponsive to the needs of pesticide users, EPA is trying to develop aprogram that will not place unnecessary burden on pesticide users. (Referto Unit II.D.3. for additional information.) In addition, EPA will also quantify the cost to society by estimating theimpacts to pesticide registrants and pesticide users regarding implementationof a generic versus county-specific labeling approach and also will qualitativelyexamine the effectiveness of these approaches. (Refer to Units III.B.1.and VII.B.1. for additional information.) The EPA will continue to work to protect listed species while at the sametime completing the case study analyses and the analysis of the genericversus county-specific labeling approaches. These analyses will be consideredin developing the final Endangered Species Protection Program. B. The Role of the States State involvement also has been an important aspect of the Program becauseeach state has its own unique situation and concerns regarding listed species.The extent to which each state is involved is a decision made by that state.Some states are developing state-initiated plans and are investigatingthe development of alternative practices that would provide protectionfor listed species, while still allowing the use of certain pesticides.Still others are developing education and training programs specific tothe needs of protecting listed species in their state. Additionally, state-initiatedplans may suggest additional local factors that EPA can consider in making``may affect'' determinations. Through the use of such factors, EPA maybe able to further narrow the scope of pesticide use limitations for agricultural,commercial, and home and garden pesticides while continuing to protectlisted species. The guiding principle for all state efforts will be toeliminate impacts on listed species so that EPA pesticide registrationactivities do not harm the species. Many states have proposed or are proposing revisions to the maps of listedspecies habitats by more accurately describing the currently-occupied habitatof the affected species. The EPA will rely as much as possible on the revisedmaps submitted by the states, although the final maps ultimately will besubject to the approval of FWS. The EPA and FWS also are working on refiningthe maps for all states. In all cases, states will be provided the opportunityto review the maps before they become final. C. Interagency Cooperation  On November 5, 1987, an informational briefing was held before the U.S.House of Representatives' Committee on Agriculture. During this briefing,the three Federal agencies most directly involved in issues related tolisted species and pesticide use agreed to form a senior level policy committeefor oversight and to ensure consistency among the Federal agencies in designingand implementing an effective program that considers the various needsof species, agricultural users of pesticides, public health, and environmentalsafety. The USDA, FWS, and EPA instituted this committee which is composed of AssistantSecretaries and Deputy Assistant Secretaries of the USDA, the Directorof FWS, the EPA Assistant Administrator for Pesticides and Toxic Substances,and the EPA Deputy Director of OPP. This interagency committee has met periodically since 1987 to discuss policyconcerns and to give senior management direction and concurrence as theEndangered Species Protection Program was designed and developed. Thispolicy committee will continue to meet as needed and will continue to ensurebroad consistency and support for the Program throughout the Federal agenciesthat are most closely associated with the issue. D. Interagency Task Groups  Three Interagency Task Groups were formed to assist EPA in developing theEndangered Species Protection Program. These groups involve EPA, FWS, andUSDA. Each agency participates to varying degrees, depending on the task.Although EPA has the overall lead in developing and implementing the EndangeredSpecies Protection Program, other Interagency Task Group members may havethe lead on developing certain types of information or may perform assistanceand review functions. The primary tasks for these groups are to provideassistance and support in the technical aspects, outreach and educationefforts, and analyses of impacts and alternatives of the Endangered SpeciesProtection Program.1. <T3>Technical Task Group. </T3>The Interagency Technical Task Group wasestablished to provide assistance and support in the planning and implementationof the technical aspects of the Endangered Species Protection Program.Current and planned efforts of the group include improving interagencyinvolvement during the consultation process, facilitating information exchange,providing technical recommendations, suggesting areas for new research,ensuring adequate review of Bulletin information for various species, andworking to improve the processes involved in map review. The TechnicalTask Group also is assisting in establishing criteria for setting prioritiesfor species potentially affected by pesticides to help focus efforts ofthe Program. Other important tasks of this group include collection and review of dataneeded to ascertain and to quantify the differences in risk associatedwith different areas of the country, application methodologies, techniques,and alternatives. The Technical Task Group is reviewing educational materialsfor technical/biological accuracy and will assist in collecting the datanecessary to improve modeling efforts as data needs are identified. The Technical Task Group may be called upon to review or to ensure adequatereview of potential use limitations, risk reduction measures, incidentaltake statements, and reasonable and prudent actions.  2. <T3>Outreach and Education Task Group. </T3>The EPA has established anInteragency Outreach and Education Task Group to help address issues ofeducation and outreach. This group performs three primary functions including(i) identifying educational needs and the mechanisms to address those needs,(ii) developing specific materials for the public, and (iii) reviewingeducational materials and outreach processes. a. <T3>Identification of educational needs and the mechanisms to address thoseneeds. </T3>Key areas in which a need for educational materials have beenidentified include: (i) The requirements of the ESA regarding pesticide registration. (ii) The EPA's process to determine whether a pesticide use ``may affect''a listed species. (iii) Specific information regarding the Endangered Species ProtectionProgram, its potential implications for pesticide use limitations, andidentification of opportunities for public participation in Program developmentand implementation. (iv) The availability of alternative pesticides, methods of use, and non-pesticidalpest control methods. The Outreach and Education Task Group also has considered mechanisms whichmight be utilized to disseminate information or ensure its availabilityto the public. The FWS and EPA Regional Offices have existing outreachand education mechanisms and may be called upon to assist in these efforts.In addition, the Soil Conservation Service (SCS) and the Cooperative ExtensionService have field personnel in nearly every county in the country. TheEPA will explore further the possibility of using these networks to establishdistribution points for information. Pesticide manufacturers, distributors,pesticide dealers, trade associations, and possibly direct mail to someareas have been identified as other possible means to distribute information.b. <T3>Development of specific materials for the public. </T3>Two specificpieces of information already are being developed by the Outreach and EducationTask Group to support the Endangered Species Protection Program. First,a brochure is being developed which will describe the applicable provisionsof ESA, its relationship to FIFRA, and the process through which EPA andFWS work to determine whether a pesticide use will harm a listed species.The FWS has taken the lead responsibility for drafting this brochure; EPAwill contribute information regarding its responsibilities under FIFRAand ESA. The resulting document will address these topics and other questionsidentified by pesticide users regarding the Program. Second, this Task Group is developing species fact sheets. Each sheet willdescribe a particular species, its habitat needs, viability, number ofpopulations, and other factors. The EPA anticipates that efforts to protectlisted species from harm will be enhanced by a better understanding ofthe species requiring protection. c. <T3>Review of educational materials and outreach processes. </T3>The Outreachand Education Task Group will review educational and outreach materialsfor content and form to ensure the widest possible acceptance of the informationand to aid in the understanding of EPA's Program. For example, informationin the form of printed and audio-visual materials on the Endangered SpeciesProtection Program in general are planned. There are also plans to distributeinformation on alternatives which will not impact listed species when thatinformation is available. 3. <T3>Impacts and Alternatives Task Group. </T3>The Impacts and AlternativesTask Group will investigate the economic costs to various segments of thepopulation affected by the Endangered Species Protection Program. The goalof this analysis is to develop a program that considers economic impacts,but still provides protection to listed species. The analysis of program impacts will be based on several case studies,which will be used to estimate a range of economic effects. These casestudies are based on the results of the existing Biological Opinions andthe pesticide use limitations that were to have gone into effect in 1988and will be conducted for field crop, fruit and vegetable crop, forestry,and public health uses. The use sites and their locations proposed for the case studies will bechosen because they represent a significant overlap of listed species andpesticide use areas, are likely to have the least number of alternativesavailable, and have a high concentration of minor use crops. As a result,these sites and/or geographical areas are expected to represent locationswhere the magnitude of economic impacts are likely to be greater than otherareas. As a result, the EPA believes that this approach will overstateeconomic impacts by providing a range of conservative estimates. The complexity of the Endangered Species Protection Program and the breadthof its coverage make a conventional approach to the analysis of impactsand alternatives difficult and costly. Data on pesticide usage, informationon alternative cropping systems and other relevant facts vary greatly inavailability and quality. Species-specific details for cropping practices,pesticide use practices, pest problems, availability and suitability ofalternative pesticide(s), and other factors often are not available orare not available in a form suitable for economic analysis. As a result,a variety of approaches to the analysis will be used in addition to thecase studies such as qualitative estimates, general overviews, and rigorouseconomic analyses where data permit.To the extent that data are available, the Impacts and Alternatives TaskGroup will also investigate possible alternatives to use limitations, suchas the timing of application and other pest control practices that maybe employed within the habitats of listed species. <ITAG tagnum="84">III. The EPA's Revised Endangered Species Protection Program  </ITAG>The EPA developed the new Endangered Species Protection Program to fulfilltwo primary objectives. The first objective is to achieve the best protectionfor listed species. The second objective is to be responsive to the needsof agricultural production in this country by developing a program thatcan be readily implemented without unnecessary burden on pesticide users.The EPA hopes to accomplish both objectives through the new Program anda new approach to biological consultation. Conceptually, the new approach to biological consultation is a species-basedapproach. The EPA believes that the goal of protecting listed species frompesticides can best be achieved by focusing on the listed species themselves,rather than on clusters of pesticide use sites, as had previously beenproposed. It should be noted that the majority of comments on EPA's previouslyproposed Program favored a species-based approach, and many variationswere suggested. The EPA has developed a species-based approach that isresponsive to its legal obligations under ESA and that meets both its objectives.(See Unit IV of this document for a discussion of other approaches thatwere considered.) The EPA believes that its second objective, reducing the burden on pesticideusers, can be met through the use of a threshold application rate approachand consideration of different exposures resulting from various applicationmethods in determining whether a pesticide ``may affect'' listed species,as well as through refined maps. The EPA will determine the threshold (lowest)application rate on the product label that ``may affect'' listed species.This approach will be used to evaluate all uses of a pesticide. Consultationwith the FWS will be limited only to the specific application rates that``may affect'' a listed species. Thus, application rates below the thresholdapplication rate will not be part of the consultation request. Achieving the objectives that EPA has set out will depend on the activeparticipation of an informed public and the rigorous application of soundscientific methods throughout the consultation process. Sound science isneeded in reviewing pesticides and their potential impacts, determiningthe location of listed species, and devising workable use limitations andalternatives. The EPA is firmly committed to developing a program thatis grounded in good science. The EPA also intends to build its Programthrough an open and participatory process that encourages the involvementof the states, counties, agricultural community, environmental groups,and the many individuals and organizations concerned about this issue.Unit III.A. summarizes the new species-based approach and is followed byan explanation of how the approach will be phased-in for species coveredby existing Biological Opinions, as well as other listed species. UnitIII.B. describes the implementation of the new approach through labelingand Bulletins. A. New Approach to Biological Consultation  1. <T3>Conceptual approach. </T3>Under the new approach, EPA will begin itsefforts with the most vulnerable of the listed species, which are thosewith the greatest need of protection. The species will be ranked basedon their status, vulnerability to pesticides, and other pertinent factors.With the assistance of FWS, EPA will then identify the counties in whicheach of the ranked species is currently located. The next step will beto determine the agricultural crops and other pesticide use sites thatare in the county. Then EPA will identify the pesticides registered for use on these sites.For each pesticide so identified, EPA will evaluate all uses to determinethose that ``may affect'' listed species and will then request a consultationfrom FWS for those pesticide uses which result in a ``may affect'' determination.Although pesticides will be selected for evaluation on the basis of vulnerablespecies, EPA requests a consultation as a result of pesticide registrationfor specific uses. Therefore, FWS may include all species that could beimpacted by pesticides referred to FWS. Subsequent consultations will focus on the next group of vulnerable speciesand associated pesticides until all species and pesticides have been considered.After this point, consultation will occur on a case-by-case basis dependingon receipt of new information, registration applications, or listing ofnew species. a. <T3>``May affect'' determinations. </T3>Under the original cluster approach,EPA based its ``may affect'' determination for a particular use of a pesticideon the highest registered application rate for that use. If EPA concludedthat the highest application rate resulted in a ``may affect'' determination,EPA requested a consultation from FWS for that use. If the FWS found jeopardy,all products containing that pesticide for that use were subject to theuse limitations to prevent jeopardy. Under the new approach, EPA will use the highest application rate on thelabel only as a screening mechanism. If the screening step indicates a``may affect'' situation, the pesticide will be evaluated further to determinethe threshold or lowest application rate that ``may affect'' listed species.(See Unit VI.B. of this document for a detailed discussion of the ``mayaffect'' determination process, and Unit VI.C. for information on the procedureused to calculate the threshold application rate.) Consultation with FWSwill be limited only to the specific application rates and uses that ``mayaffect'' listed species. In developing ``may affect'' determinations, EPA will take into account,to the extent data are available, other aspects of exposure such as applicationmethods, timing, and species biology. These factors, coupled with the useof more precise models than were available in the past, will serve to provideFWS with better information on which to base Biological Opinions. In conducting its evaluation, EPA will use available validated toxicitydata and information on potential exposure. Where appropriate and available,EPA will include data that are site-specific to a species' location. IfEPA finds a need to reevaluate a ``may affect'' determination, EPA willuse any other available new data and new scientific methodology, such asrefined models.Once the threshold application rate for a pesticide is established, EPAwill determine if any known measures could alter the ``may affect'' determinationor reduce exposure. This information will be given to FWS when EPA requestsconsultation or reinitiates consultation on existing Opinions. If the thresholdapplication rate is lower than any registered application rates, EPA willconclude that all of the registered application rates will result in a``may affect'' determination. Most commonly, pesticide threats to listed species will be from acute toxicityfrom direct exposure. However, ``may affect'' determinations may be madeon the basis of secondary toxicity; cumulative, reproductive, or chroniceffects; or effects on habitat or food supply. Where EPA has sufficientinformation, evaluations of these kinds of effects will also be based ona threshold application rate. (See Unit VI for additional information.)b. <T3>Public notification.</T3> The EPA intends to provide public notification30 days prior to initiating consultation with FWS. The EPA will identifythe pesticides, use sites, and species evaluated and will summarize the``may affect'' determinations. The supporting material for EPA's ``mayaffect'' determination will be available for review at OPP. The amount of information that EPA must review and validate in making a``may affect'' determination can be very extensive. At the same time, EPAneeds to formally consult with FWS in a timely manner to fulfill its obligationsunder ESA. The EPA is committed to using the best scientific data availablein making a ``may affect'' determination. Submission of such informationto EPA early in the process will enhance EPA's ability to validate thedata and use the information effectively. In addition, if a pesticide registrant wishes to amend a registration insuch a way that the pesticide would no longer affect listed species, EPAwill review its preliminary ``may affect'' determination in light of therequested amendment. For example, a pesticide registrant may wish to eliminatea high exposure use pattern or modify the application rate to lower thepotential exposure to listed species. A change in application methodology,timing of application, or type of formulation may, in some cases, reduceexposure sufficiently to preclude effects to listed species. The EPA encourages identification of additional reasonable and prudentactions that will protect the listed species while minimizing the limitationson pesticide use. Data, information on suggested reasonable and prudentactions, and requests for amendment will be considered prior to consultationor in a later reinitiation of consultation, depending on the timelinessof the submission. c. <T3>Consultation.</T3> At the conclusion of the 30-day notification period,EPA will request consultation with FWS. As part of the consultation package,EPA may propose to FWS any known measures to reduce exposure that may representreasonable and prudent alternatives to preclude jeopardy if jeopardy isfound, or otherwise reduce impacts to the species. During the consultation process, EPA, FWS, and USDA will be working toexchange information on exposure. They will attempt to identify relationshipsbetween species and pesticide use sites, as well as modifications of usewhich could be used as reasonable and prudent actions. Before FWS issuesits Biological Opinion, EPA may request a draft Opinion for review. Duringthis review, EPA will focus on the proposed reasonable and prudent actionsspecified by FWS. If warranted, EPA will forward alternative suggestionsto FWS for their consideration in developing their final Biological Opinion.d. <T3>Biological Opinion.</T3> The final result of the consultation processis a Biological Opinion developed by FWS. It is important to note thatnot all pesticides that EPA refers to FWS through a ``may affect'' determinationwill necessarily be found by FWS to cause jeopardy to a species or resultin reasonable and prudent measures to reduce incidental take. The jeopardydeclaration or incidental take provision can be based on an assessmentof whether a species will actually be exposed to the pesticide in question.After EPA receives the final Biological Opinion, EPA will publish a noticeof availability in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> and provide an opportunity for comment. Any newinformation resulting from these public comments may be used to reinitiateconsultation, if warranted. When the Biological Opinion is issued, FWS will provide currently-occupiedhabitat maps, habitat descriptions, or the information necessary for EPAto develop these. For those species that the FWS determines are subjectto threats from collection, FWS will suggest reasonable and prudent actionsthat do not rely on mapping. The EPA will arrange for the states to reviewthe maps and any habitat descriptions. Upon completion of this process, EPA will make this information availableto the public for their use prior to enforceable limitations being imposed.This will allow the public an opportunity to comment on the informationand provide an additional opportunity for submitting suggestions for reasonableand prudent actions. Based on comments at any stage of the review process,EPA will work with FWS to resolve any problems or reinitiate consultationwhere appropriate. 2. <T3>Phased process.</T3> To carry out the new approach, EPA will proceedin several phases. First, in the ``catch-up'' phase EPA will reinitiateconsultation to update existing Biological Opinions to incorporate newlylisted species, all uses, and additional information now available on thepesticides involved. This reinitiation is a result of a request from FWSbecause of the need to update the Biological Opinions, to incorporate specieslisted since the Opinions were issued, and to provide incidental take statements.The second phase involves additional consultations on all remaining registeredpesticides. The third phase is characterized as a ``maintenance'' phase,whereby EPA maintains ongoing compliance with the ESA. a. <T3>Existing Biological Opinions.</T3> Using the new approach, EPA willreevaluate the ``may affect'' determinations and review all of the existingBiological Opinions generated from the 1982 to l984 ``cluster'' consultations.Biological Opinions that resulted from registration and reregistrationprocesses will also be included. First, EPA will identify species for whichjeopardy was declared and incidental take identified, as well as the pesticideswhich prompted the findings. The EPA will focus initially on the most vulnerablespecies in identifying the pesticides that will be evaluated first. Mostimportantly, identified pesticides will be evaluated to include all usesites, not just those in the previously defined clusters. Before the new approach was developed, EPA reinitiated consultation inSeptember 1988 on a portion of the existing Biological Opinions that weregenerated from the 1982 to 1984 cluster consultations. This reinitiationresulted from a request from FWS. It was intended to clarify the statusof certain pesticides and/or species, allow EPA to refine its ``may affect''determinations, and allow FWS to review its approach to evaluating datafor Biological Opinions. The EPA intends to reinitiate consultation onthe remaining portions of the existing Biological Opinions. This consultationwill use the new approach and include any species/pesticide combinationsfrom the September 1988 reinitiation, as necessary.b. <T3>Additional consultations. </T3>Once EPA has completed reinitiationof consultation on all of the existing Biological Opinions, EPA will beginevaluating pesticides not included in the existing Biological Opinions.Using a ranked list of vulnerable species, EPA will identify pesticideuse sites that could expose the listed species to pesticides (i.e., pesticideuse sites within the county in which the species is found). The EPA willevaluate the toxicity data and determine whether any uses of the selectedpesticides ``may affect'' listed species. The EPA will then request consultationwith FWS. c. <T3>Maintenance. </T3>Once all registered pesticides have been evaluatedusing the new approach, EPA's obligations to consult under ESA will befulfilled through an ongoing process of evaluation and referral. Registrationactions for new pesticides or new uses of existing pesticides will be evaluatedas they are received. Any new pesticides or new uses that exceed the ``mayaffect'' criteria will be referred to FWS for a Biological Opinion priorto granting the registration request. If new, valid information becomesavailable on existing pesticide registrations, EPA will re-evaluate its``may affect'' determinations and reinitiate consultation when appropriate.The EPA anticipates that reinitiations on the basis of new informationwill occur on an annual or biannual basis. Periodically, EPA will reinitiateconsultation on pesticides already included in the Program to obtain BiologicalOpinions for newly listed species. 3. <T3>Conclusions. </T3>The EPA believes that the new approach embodied inthe revised proposed Endangered Species Protection Program will allow EPAto fulfill its obligations to protect listed species under ESA withoutunduly burdening the agricultural community and other pesticide users.The new approach avoids creating situations where some uses of a pesticideare limited while other uses, within the same geographic location, arenot. By considering all uses of a pesticide at one time, the new approachwill better protect listed species in the Program from nearly all threatsof a pesticide, thus operating in a more integrated and equitable manner.The new approach also allows for reasonably rapid implementation of actionsspecified in the existing Biological Opinions that EPA has received fromFWS. This will facilitate EPA's efforts to fulfill its obligations underthe ESA. Finally, since threshold application rates will be used in the new approach,it may be possible to identify certain lower application rates and certainapplication methods that will not result in ``may affect'' determinationsor that may not result in FWS specifying actions to protect listed species.The EPA will be using the best available information and science to assessthe risks resulting from particular application rates and methods. B. Implementation The EPA will implement the new Endangered Species Protection Program throughpesticide labeling, which will refer users to county-specific Bulletins.Several important changes are being proposed in the labeling/bulletin approachdescribed in the March 9, 1988, FR Notice (53 FR 7716). These changes willmake the new Program equally effective, but easier to implement and lessburdensome to pesticide manufacturers and users. These changes includethe use of a generic label statement on affected products (rather thanlisting all affected counties on the labeling), refining habitat maps,and identifying reasonable and prudent actions to mitigate jeopardy andanticipated incidental take. 1. <T3>Labeling/bulletin approach. </T3>When modifications in pesticide useare necessary to protect a listed species, the product registrant willbe instructed that in order to remain in compliance with FIFRA, the productlabel must be modified to inform the user that the product can only beused in compliance with a county Bulletin. The labeling of affected productswill not list the counties in which limitations on pesticide use apply,as had previously been proposed, nor will labeling require the user toobtain a Bulletin. Instead, the labels on affected products will requirethat users in all counties comply with use limitations in the Bulletinfor the county in which they intend to use the pesticide. As in EPA's previouslyproposed Program, the Bulletins will contain a county map showing the geographicarea associated with each species of concern, depending on the sensitivityof the species to other factors such as collection. The Bulletins willidentify the pesticides that may harm these species and describe the uselimitations necessary to protect them. For those counties in which no limitations apply, the county Bulletin willindicate that use of the pesticide according to label directions is appropriate.These Bulletins will also provide general information regarding the protectionof listed species. (Refer to Unit IV.7.a. for additional discussion.) All Bulletins will contain an address to which a pesticide user or otherinterested party may direct comments, as well as suggestions for improvingthe information contained in the Bulletins, pertinent technical information,and suggestions for less stringent but equally protective reasonable andprudent alternatives to the use limitations. Technically valid informationreceived by EPA may be used to reinitiate consultation with FWS. The Bulletins will also indicate the responsibilities under the ESA ofFederal agencies that handle pesticides. Federal agencies that have completeda formal consultation under section 7 of the ESA for a specific project,where that project involves use of an identified pesticide in an area onthe map where use limitations exist, are required to adhere to the proceduresand limitations provided by the FWS in their specific consultation. Federalagencies that have not completed a formal section 7 consultation must conformto the limitations in the Bulletin. The EPA will make every effort to ensure that the Bulletins will be availablein advance of the time that pesticide labels are modified to refer usersto the Bulletins. The Bulletins will be updated no more frequently thanonce per year, if needed, to add or delete limitations or to incorporatenew information received from pesticide users and other interested parties.The EPA will use many available avenues to ensure wide distribution ofand easy access to the county Bulletins. Distribution mechanisms currentlyexist through training and certification programs within the states, throughthe Cooperative Extension Service, and EPA Regional Offices. The EPA willfocus on these existing mechanisms for distribution of the Bulletins. However,EPA also intends to explore other avenues such as pesticide dealers anddistributors, SCS field offices, and FWS regional and field offices.The EPA intends to rely heavily on the cooperative efforts of pesticideusers to protect listed species from harmful pesticides. However, it shouldbe noted that the labeling/bulletin approach provides for the same degreeof enforcement under the protective measures of FIFRA as would apply toany use information applicable to a registered product. This allows EPAto fulfill its obligations under ESA to ensure that pesticide registrationwill not harm listed species.2. <T3>Implementation timing. </T3>The EPA anticipates that implementationof enforceable measures to protect listed species from pesticides willbegin in January 1991 with the issuance of PR Notices to registrants ofaffected pesticide products. During 1989 and 1990, EPA will encourage voluntarymeasures to protect listed species. When EPA receives the results of itsconsultation with FWS, maps and county-specific Bulletins will be developed.Once Bulletins are developed and reviewed, EPA will issue to registrantsa PR Notice that they must amend their labels. The PR Notice will indicatea specific time for products released from the manufacturer to bear therevised labeling.These registrants include the producers of all pesticide products whichresulted in Biological Opinions declaring jeopardy to a listed speciesor indicating the possibility of incidental take. The PR Notices will indicatethat in order to remain in compliance with FIFRA, pesticide registrantsmust modify the labeling of products affected by the Endangered SpeciesProtection Program. All affected products released for shipment after aspecified date will be required to carry a label statement directing theuser of the product to use the product only in accordance with the uselimitations in the Bulletin.A PR Notice will be issued annually, if needed, to notify pesticide registrantsof additional products affected by the Program or products that have beenremoved from the Program. Because the label statement will be generic andcounties will not be listed, registrants will not need to change theirproduct labels whenever use limitations are extended to new counties orrescinded in currently identified counties. Label changes will be necessaryonly if the reasonable and prudent actions specified in a Biological Opinionare rescinded for all uses of a product. The EPA will review the countyBulletins as necessary but update them not more than once annually. Inaddition, EPA will rely heavily on the Federal agencies and the statesfor information regarding new areas of occupied habitat.3. <T3>State-initiated plans. </T3>In response to state concerns, in 1987EPA offered each affected state the opportunity to develop a state-initiatedplan for protecting listed species. Such a plan would recommend measureswhich EPA could use to protect listed species in that state. When state-initiatedplans are submitted to EPA for review and approval, EPA will consult withFWS to determine that the provisions of the plan will constitute reasonableand prudent actions to protect listed species within that state. If approved,EPA would adopt the state-initiated plan and require through the Bulletinthat users comply with the requirements of the plan. State-initiated planscan be developed for all or a portion of the species affected in that state.States may submit a state-initiated plan to EPA at any time. However, oncefederally initiated requirements are implemented within a state, thoserequirements will be effective in the state until the state-initiated planis approved and implemented. C. ExemptionAll indoor uses of pesticide products are exempt from the requirementsof the Endangered Species Protection Program.D. Public Health EmergenciesUnder section 18 of FIFRA (40 CFR Part 166), a State or Federal publichealth agency may request that EPA grant an emergency exemption for a publichealth emergency or utilize the crisis provision (40 CFR 166.50), if aState or Federal agency can demonstrate that:(1) An emergency, non-routine condition exists that requires the use ofa pesticide.(2) Effective registered pesticides or alternative practices are not availableor economically or environmentally feasible.(3) The situation will present significant risks to human health.Public health emergencies, verified by State or Federal public health authorities,include (i) situations in which a pest outbreak poses a significant riskto human health or in which the elements for disease outbreak (i.e., virusactivity, large population of disease vectors either present or pending,or others) are demonstrated to be in place and prompt action is requiredto avert an actual disease outbreak, and (ii) situations in which an actualdisease outbreak is in progress and immediate action is essential to arrestthe outbreak. In the latter case, a crisis exemption under section 18 maybe appropriate, which allows a Federal or State agency to authorize theemergency use of a pesticide if its use is critical and enough time isnot available for EPA to receive and complete a review of the specificpublic health exemption request. In either case, EPA will expedite theprocess through emergency consultation with FWS. Prior involvement withFWS will ensure rapid processing of the application.As indicated, public health emergencies must be verified by State or Federalpublic health authorities. Where state verification capability is inadequate,section 18 applications should detail verification procedures includinginvolvement of the Centers for Disease control (CDC). The EPA is workingwith the CDC and the American Mosquito Control Association to establishverification criteria and to develop a model for use by States. Publichealth agencies should recognize that prior to any emergency, local managersshould be aware of any listed species within their jurisdiction and ofthe limitations imposed on pesticides which threaten those species. Requestsfor a public health or a crisis emergency exemption under section 18 foruse of designated pesticides in the habitat of listed species should bean action of ``last resort'' after alternative pesticides and actions havebeen investigated and determined to be inadequate.A State or Federal agency must follow the requirements under 40 CFR Part166 when requesting a public health emergency exemption or utilizing thecrisis provision. For an emergency exemption, the request must includea record of contacts with and recommendations made by the FWS office havingjurisdiction in the area of concern regarding the use of alternative methodsof vector control. If the crisis exemption is utilized, EPA must be notifiedwithin 48 hours and a report submitted in accordance with 40 CFR 166.50.If a crisis exemption is to be utilized for longer than 15 days, a publichealth exemption must be submitted.Generally, in accordance with the ESA, EPA does not authorize use of apesticide under section 18 if that pesticide will jeopardize a listed species.However, during emergency circumstances, a public health exemption undersection 18 may, if no practical alternative control measures are available,be sought for the use of a pesticide that was found to jeopardize listedspecies in the habitat of the species. E. Enforcement Enforcement of the use limitations that will be imposed for pesticidesincluded in this Program to protect listed species will be carried outunder two provisions of FIFRA, misbranding (FIFRA section 12(a)(1)(E))and misuse (FIFRA section 12(a)(2)(G)). Products whose use requires limitationsto protect listed species and which do not carry the necessary informationon the product labeling, will be identified through routine inspectionsof manufacturing facilities and pesticide distributors and dealers or throughinformation received regarding suspected misbranding. Products found tobe misbranded (i.e., do not carry the required label language to protectlisted species) may be subject to cancellation. In the field, pesticidemisuse will be identified similarly through routine inspection and informationprovided regarding alleged misuse of a pesticide product. In addition,FWS could take enforcement action under the ESA against unlawful takingif a person harms a species through pesticide use or any other means, unlessFWS has provided for incidental take and pesticide use is in accordancewith label directions, and any required reasonable and prudent actions.Enforcement will be carried out by the states through the existing enforcementcooperative agreements with EPA. In states that do not have primary enforcementresponsibility under FIFRA, EPA will enforce the labeling and use provisionsnecessary to mitigate jeopardy to or reduce incidental take of listed species.As stated earlier, EPA intends to have an enforceable Program beginningin 1991. Successful education and training efforts will serve to increaseunderstanding of, and therefore, compliance with the pesticide use limitationsto protect listed species.<ITAG tagnum="84">IV. Discussion of Public Comments on Previous Proposal</ITAG>The EPA received over 600 public comments on its previously proposed EndangeredSpecies Protection Program. These comments were made in response to theFR Notice (53 FR 7716) and the public meetings held in the spring of 1988.These comments were given great weight by EPA in developing the new Programand are summarized in the following units, which are organized by topic.EPA's response follows each topic summary. 1. <T3>Burden of proof.</T3> Several comments questioned who should be responsiblefor demonstrating that a pesticide may harm a listed species, since dataare not always available to show a direct cause-and-effect relationshipbetween a pesticide and the decline of a species. Some comments indicatedthat EPA should assume that a pesticide will harm a species and that theburden of proof should be placed upon the registrants or users to demonstratethat harm will not occur. In contrast, other comments indicated that the burden of proof should beon EPA or FWS to demonstrate that the use of a particular pesticide causesa threat to a listed species before any use limitations on the pesticideare imposed. These comments asserted that EPA should assume that pesticideuse will not harm a species, unless a direct cause-and-effect can be demonstrated.Other comments indicated that the major threat to listed species is fromland development and not from pesticide use. As a result, it was suggestedthat pesticide use not be limited at all. <T3>Response:</T3> The EPA has sufficient information to justify takingthe steps proposed in this FR Notice. Every use limitation that could beimplemented under this Program would be based on both EPA's ``may affect''determination and the issuance of reasonable and prudent actions by FWS.Such findings will be based on the best scientific data available. The ESA is designed to provide protection to listed species to preventthem from becoming extinct and to their habitat to prevent adverse alteration.The EPA's responsibilities under the ESA dictate that it cannot wait toregulate a pesticide until conclusive proof of direct harm to a listedspecies has been compiled, submitted, and analyzed. Section 7 of the ESAis designed to prevent such harm before it occurs.To determine potential risks to listed species, EPA conducts a risk assessmentto arrive at a ``may affect'' determination. (Refer to Unit VI.B. of thisdocument for additional information regarding how EPA goes about makinga ``may affect'' determination.) Initially, EPA utilizes toxicity datafrom tests on surrogate species identified in the FIFRA guidelines (40CFR Part 158). These data currently represent a wide range of animal speciesand are extrapolated to a variety of species that may be impacted, includingthose that are federally listed. The EPA also evaluates exposure. In many cases, field data are not availableto assess impacts directly, and assessments must be made based on otherinformation, such as on product use patterns, predictions of the fate ofthe product in the environment, and species biology. When available, EPAuses actual validated fate data, monitoring data, and mortality reports.Although habitat loss, including loss resulting from land development,may be the primary reason a species is federally listed, other factorsalso may place stress on the species and exacerbate the threats to itscontinued existence. For example, evidence is not available to suggestthat federally listed species, in general, are more or less sensitive totoxicological characteristics of a pesticide than are non-listed species.However, listed species may not be able to respond quickly to populationfluctuations caused by mortality or depression of reproductive functionsbecause of their biology and status. Localized negative impacts on foodsupplies could be significant in terms of the survival and reproductionof listed species. Since the population of a listed species is generallyalready significantly reduced, the population is likely to be more susceptibleto additional environmental stresses, in addition to habitat loss, thanare non-listed species. 2. <T3>Exemptions. </T3>Several comments requested exemptions to the EndangeredSpecies Protection Program's use limitations and provided comment on theexemptions identified in the FR Notice (53 FR 77I7). a. <T3>Public health programs. </T3>Several comments indicated that publichealth programs should be exempt and take precedence over the protectionof listed species, even if this results in harm to the species. One comment recommended that an annual review of vector control programsbe performed and their potential effect on listed species identified. Generalcontrol methods and pesticides could then be approved in advance of anypublic health emergency. <T3>Response: </T3>The EPA recognizes the importance of the use of pesticidesin public health emergencies where expeditious control of disease vectorssuch as mosquitoes and fleas is required. The EPA has been working withthe CDC, American Mosquito Control Association, and others knowledgeableabout vector control procedures. The EPA proposes in Unit III of this documentthat current FIFRA section 18 exemption procedures be the method to accommodatepublic health emergencies. Guidelines are under development to assist stateand local public health agencies in making expedited use of this process.Section 18 of FIFRA provides for exemption of Federal and state agenciesfor use of pesticides under emergency conditions. There are four typesof emergency exemptions which may be authorized. The first is a specificexemption for an emergency condition to avert a significant economic lossor a significant risk to listed species, beneficial organisms, or the environment.The second is a quarantine exemption, which is an emergency condition involvingthe introduction or spread of a new pest to the United States. The thirdis a public health exemption for a situation involving a pest that willcause a significant risk to human health. For each of these three, an applicationfor approval must be submitted to EPA in accordance with the regulationsat 40 CFR Part 166. The fourth is a crisis exemption, which allows a Federalor state agency to authorize the emergency use of a pesticide for any ofthe previous reasons, if use is critical and there is insufficient timefor EPA to receive or complete review on a specific quarantine, or publichealth exemption. Regulations pertinent to section 18 of FIFRA are detailedin 40 CFR Part 166. b. <T3>Areas less than one-half acre, private landowners, golf courses, realestate developments. </T3>Other comments requested exemptions for areasof less than one-half acre, private landowners, golf courses, and realestate developments. <T3>Response: </T3>The EPA's policy is to protect listed species in theircurrently occupied habitat. Providing exemptions for areas less than one-halfacre, private landowners, golf courses, or real estate developments mightexpose some species to pesticides which could adversely impact listed speciesor their habitats. Thus, EPA could not grant such exemptions and stillbe in compliance with the ESA. c. <T3>Forestry. </T3>Some comments indicated that the forestry exemptionidentified in the previous FR Notice (53 FR 7177) should not be allowed.This exemption included direct individual plant sprays and/or individualplant injection, seed beds and seed orchards (incorrectly identified inthe previous FR Notice as seedbed orchards), nursery plantings, ornamentaltrees, and ornamental shrubs. Other comments indicated that forest uses should be exempt, and if not,less stringent use limitations should be applied to pesticide use in forests,since pesticides are only applied on a limited basis and are applied atlower application rates in forests, as opposed to agricultural sites. <T3>Response: </T3>The forest uses previously proposed to be exempt nolonger would be exempt under the revised proposed Program. The EPA is concernedabout the potential exposure to listed species from these forestry uses.Unless EPA can be assured that a particular application method or use sitewill result in no exposure to listed species, then EPA must decline a nationwideexemption. For example, EPA seriously considered exempting woody plantinjections. However, woody plant injections could be made to colony treesof red-cockaded woodpeckers, thus destroying their habitat. EPA also previouslyproposed to exempt seed beds and seed orchards (53 FR 7717). Upon reconsideration,EPA recognizes that listed species could be exposed from such uses dueto drift or run-off of a pesticide from such areas or as a result of thespecies being present during application. EPA acknowledges that there may be only a few situations in which theseforestry uses could expose listed species. Using the threshold approach,EPA may find that lower application rates may be a reasonable and prudentaction that could preclude harm to a listed species. In other cases, alack of exposure at specific forestry sites may be more appropriately handledthrough the county Bulletins rather than through a nationwide exemption.The EPA is working with the USDA Forest Service through the InteragencyTask Groups and is also working with other interested parties to analyzeand evaluate the full range of application methodologies used in the forestryindustry. If further information indicates that other methodologies willeliminate the threat to listed species, EPA will reconsider its positionand take steps necessary to exempt such methodologies. d. <T3>Reintroduced populations. </T3>Comments recommended that reintroducedpopulations of species should not be covered by the Program. A reintroducedpopulation consists of a listed species that is being reintroduced intoits former habitat in the hope that it will reestablish itself.The question also was raised regarding when a reintroduced population wouldbe considered to have stabilized enough to have its current habitat subjectto the Program. <T3>Response: </T3>The FWS is the agency responsible for developing species'recovery plans. Reintroducing species into its former habitat is oftenpart of a recovery plan and can be undertaken through formal regulatoryprocedures (50 CFR 17.80) or less formal procedures. The FWS procedures,policies, and regulations for reintroduced species include Federal, state,and public involvement. The EPA is obligated to protect species habitats based on the results ofESA section 7 Biological Opinions and information supplied from FWS concerningoccupied habitats, which may or may not include reintroduced populations.Inclusion of these reintroduced populations for protection under the Programwill be determined on a case-by-case basis, based on a Biological Opinion,the advice of FWS, and the involved state and Federal agencies in accordancewith existing procedures for public involvement. e. <T3>Federal agencies. </T3>Some comments indicated that Federal agenciesshould be exempt from the Program. Others indicated that Federal agenciesshould not be exempt and should be required to follow the ESA and any ofEPA's identified use limitations. <T3>Response. </T3>Federal agencies are required to adhere to the proceduresand limitations provided by section 7 of ESA. As discussed in Unit IIIof this document, those Federal agencies that have completed a formal consultationunder section 7 of ESA for a specific project involving the use of an affectedpesticide where it might harm a listed species are required to adhere tothe procedures and limitations provided by FWS through their specific consultation.If a Federal agency has not completed a consultation, the agency must conformto the requirements of ESA and comply with the instructions on productlabels and in the appropriate Bulletins. f. <T3>Home and garden use. </T3>Some comments indicated that the exemptionfor home and garden use, which was identified in the FR Notice (53 FR 7717),should not be allowed. Risks to listed species are not dependent on whoapplies the product. <T3>Response: </T3>The EPA agrees that the factor triggering inclusionof a product in the Program must be the risk it poses to listed speciesand not the person who will apply the product. In EPA's previously proposed Program, three factors supported the householdproducts exemption. First, EPA believed that the majority of householdpesticide products with use limitations would not have actually resultedin harm to listed species. Household products often result in lower estimatedenvironmental concentrations (EEC's) than products used in commercial settingsdue to a smaller area being treated and in some cases a lower percentageactive ingredient in the product. Also, EPA was using the highest registeredapplication rate of a product to determine whether the product ``may affect''listed species. Second, EPA believed that few listed species are likely to be closely associatedwith residential areas because of habitat modifications which are likelyto result during residential development. Finally, EPA believed that providing Bulletins to household users of pesticideswould be difficult given the lack of routine contact of this user groupwith the Cooperative Extension Service, the major proposed route of Bulletindissemination, and given the diversity of retailers who offer householdpesticides for sale. Upon reconsideration, EPA believes that it must eliminate the formerlyproposed household product exemption to fulfill its obligations under section7 of ESA because listed species could be exposed to pesticide exposurefrom household products. However, EPA proposes to exempt indoor pesticideuses where exposure to listed species does not occur. The EPA anticipates that the limitations on the use of outdoor homeownerpesticide products will be minimal and that the number of users affectedwill be small. Under the revised proposed Program, EPA will consider applicationrates and methodologies and formulation types in its determination of whethera pesticide ``may affect'' listed species. Therefore, limitations wouldbe necessary only on uses of a product which specifically have been determinedto result in jeopardy to listed species or where FWS has provided specificmeasures to reduce incidental take. Under the previously proposed Program,the high incidence of cases where limitations would be imposed on householdproducts that would not affect listed species would be eliminated usingEPA's revised proposed ``may affect'' procedures. Also, significantly more precise maps of listed species habitat and EPA'sproposed use of habitat descriptions to supplement these maps would contributeto decreasing the incidence of overly broad limitations on use. The EPA believes that the population of household pesticide users affectedby the new proposed Program will be small because 5 to 10 percent of totalpesticide usage in the United States is in the home and garden sector.Of that amount, the indoor pesticide market accounts for approximately70 to 80 percent. Of those remaining household products that are used outdoors,it is predicted that a limited number will require limitations to protectlisted species. The volume of household pesticides used is small because the amount ofpesticides individual members of a household purchase is generally small.However, this could still result in a potentially large number of individualsbeing affected. The EPA will consider the concentration of the active ingredient in pesticideproducts, application rates and methods, and areas to be treated when determiningthe EEC that may result from use of pesticide products. The EPA will alsoconsider the nature of the products. For example, canned ant baits andsmall volume pressurized aerosols such as certain insect sprays would probablyresult in low EEC's and thus not result in a ``may affect'' determination.In all cases, EPA will determine that the product ``may affect'' listedspecies only if this EEC meets the ``may affect'' criteria (see Unit VIof this document) and will refer to the FWS for consultation, only thosethat ``may affect'' listed species. Further, the FWS considers the probableuse locations in relation to listed species habitat, and use limitationswill not be imposed unless there may be use of the pesticide near a listedspecies. Given EPA's refined procedures and more explicit identification of listedspecies habitats, limitations on the use of a product would be requiredonly in instances where there may be an actual threat to listed species.For these reasons, EPA believes that limitations on the use of householdpesticide products to protect listed species will be minimal. However,EPA will continue to explore additional factors to further narrow the scopeof use limitations while continuing to protect listed species. Additionally,states may suggest innovative approaches to reduce the burden on pesticideusers, while protecting listed species, through their state-initiated plans.Even though EPA believes it should withdraw the previously proposed householdproducts exemption, it still believes the process of ensuring easy accessto Bulletins for users of these products may be difficult. The EPA is concernedthat difficulty in obtaining Bulletins will result in decreased compliancewith measures intended to protect listed species. Given EPA's proposeduse of generic labeling as discussed in the response to comment number7, the issue of Bulletin availability becomes more critical. Therefore,while EPA believes it must abandon a household products exemption, it recognizesthat the proposed implementation approach using a generic label statementand Bulletins may not be an effective communication tool for this subsetof products. The EPA intends to explore alternative communication channelsduring its Interim Program in 1989 and 1990 and will determine how we maypilot different implementation approaches for household products duringthat same time. In addition, EPA encourages specific comments on this Noticeto suggest potential alternative implementation mechanisms for householdproducts. 3. <T3>Economic impacts. </T3>Many comments expressed concern about the potentiallydisruptive economic effects of the Endangered Species Protection Program.Some comments indicated that EPA should prepare an Environmental ImpactStatement and an economic impact analysis on the Program. In contrast,others indicated that ESA did not allow for economic impact considerations.<T3>Response: </T3>The EPA agrees that limitations on pesticide use mayimpose some burden on pesticide users, particularly where few or no alternativepesticides or management practices are available. EPA is pursuing means to assess the economic impacts of the Program andis committed to reducing those impacts on the user community as much ascan be achieved through continued work with FWS, USDA, user groups, andthe states. The USDA, EPA, and FWS have formed the Interagency Impactsand Alternatives Task Group to assist in this effort. However, economicimpacts must be considered in the context of the objective of providingprotection to listed species. The EPA will continue to develop measuresthat both protect listed species and minimize disruption to the user community,to the maximum extent feasible. 4. <T3>User compensation. </T3>Comments recommended that EPA should compensateusers for any losses resulting from pesticide use limitations. Commentssuggested that one such source could be through the Conservation ReserveProgram. Comments also asserted that placing limitations on pesticide use to protectlisted species could be a ``taking'' without due process or just compensation,thereby entitling the pesticide user to claim direct financial compensationfrom the government. <T3>Response: </T3>The EPA is responsible for ensuring that registeredpesticides will not result in unreasonable adverse effects to the environmentwhen used according to labeling instructions. In order to permit pesticideproducts to remain registered while carrying out this mandate of FIFRA,EPA must, in many cases, impose limitations on the use of a product. Theselimitations often include specific limitations on use. Examples includespecific sites or crops that may or may not be treated with the product;limitations on planting crops for which the product is not registered,in soils having been treated with the product (rotational crop limitations);and requirements that certain products not be used when pollinating insectsare actively visiting the site. The EPA believes that measures necessaryto ensure that pesticide use will not harm listed species are conditionsof the pesticide registration similar to those other limitations necessaryfor the product to remain in compliance with FIFRA. The EPA has not anddoes not intend to pursue compensation for pesticide users whenever a conditionof the registration, necessary for a product to remain in compliance withFIFRA, limits the manner in which the product can be used. Regarding whether imposing use limitations to protect listed species mightconstitute a ``taking,'' EPA believes that the use of pesticides is nota property right. Therefore, establishing use limitations does not constitutea ``taking.'' 5. <T3>Local appeals. </T3>Comments indicated a need for a process which wouldprovide for individual requests for site-specific modifications of pesticideuse limitations in those cases when the user impact would be large. <T3>Response: </T3>The EPA believes that its revised Program is responsiveto local needs in the following ways: First, EPA is inviting public comment on all aspects of the Program, includinghabitat maps and whether listed species could be adequately protected byalternatives other than a pesticide use prohibition. Second, if a state develops an approved state-initiated plan, local usersand other members of the public may have an opportunity to provide informationto their state lead agency regarding local conditions. Such informationmay be relevant to some modification of the national plan or to developspecific alternative limitations to protect a species. The state lead agencyin turn may incorporate the local suggestions into the state-initiatedplan. The state-initiated plan would have to be approved by EPA with FWSconcurrence. Third, local users may provide EPA with information to refine or modifya ``may affect'' determination. If review indicates that a ``may affect''determination no longer applies, EPA can reinitiate consultation with theFWS to withdraw a finding of jeopardy. Local users may also provide suggestionson additional reasonable and prudent alternatives following the issuanceof a Biological Opinion. 6. <T3>Principal Program alternatives. </T3>The EPA received many commentson alternatives to the Program described in the FR Notice (53 FR 7716).a. <T3>Approach to biological consultations. </T3>The public comments raisedvery serious concerns about the proposed cluster approach for initiatingconsultations with the FWS and indicated a strong preference for a species-basedapproach, followed by a preference for an approach based on individualpesticides. The cluster approach involved evaluating a group (cluster) of pesticidesregistered for the same use site, such as use in forests. The EPA wouldrefer those pesticides in a particular cluster that exceeded the ``mayaffect'' criteria to FWS for consultation in accordance with section 7of ESA. The clusters that would be evaluated first are those with the usepatterns where the most pesticides are applied. Additional cluster consultationswould continue until all pesticide use patterns that may expose listedspecies were covered. The majority of the comments recommended that this approach be abandoned.Others indicated that EPA had not described the approach adequately forusers to understand it. The principal objection to the cluster approach is that a particular pesticidemay be used within the same geographic location on a site not yet evaluated,such as melons, while the use of the same pesticide may not be allowedfor an evaluated site, such as corn. This inequity is often referred toas the corn/melon inequity. Thus, a listed species has no protection againstuses of products that have not been evaluated and would give the growersof some crops an advantage over growers of other crops. The majority of the comments favored an approach based on species. Severalversions of a species approach were suggested, all of which involved identifyingpesticide uses associated with the habitats of listed species. Most commonly,the species would be protected in order of priority based on the perceivedpesticide threat, status, recovery potential of the species, and othercriteria. The location and habitat of priority species would be identified.Then pesticides registered for use patterns associated with the habitatsoccupied by those species would be determined. Consultation for priorityspecies would be requested on all pesticides registered for those use patternsand which exceed the ``may affect'' criteria for priority species. Additionalconsultations would continue until all species are covered. Each year,the group of pesticides potentially affecting the highest priority specieswould be reviewed and limitations established as needed to protect thespecies. However, other comments raised concerns that this approach wouldnot allow EPA to implement the existing Biological Opinions that declaredjeopardy in a timely manner. In the approach based on individual pesticides, choice of pesticides tobe evaluated first would be based on their toxicity, class of chemical,sufficiency of the data base, and other criteria. Then all uses of thesepesticides would be evaluated to determine if a use exceeds the ``may affect''criteria. Those that exceed the ``may affect'' criteria would be furtherevaluated to determine which species may be exposed. Consultation wouldbe requested for all uses of pesticides which exceed the ``may affect''criteria. Additional pesticide consultations would continue until all pesticidesrequiring consultation are covered. Most of the comments addressing this topic opposed an approach based onindividual pesticides because it would be too slow to be effective andwould not protect the species. <T3>Response: </T3>Originally, EPA favored the cluster approach becauseEPA believed that this approach provided protection to listed species inthe shortest period of time and allowed EPA to address the most significantuse patterns first. At the time, EPA believed that this was the only approachof the three that would allow EPA to implement a Program which addressesall the existing Biological Opinions in a timely manner, thus fulfillingEPA's legal obligation under the ESA. The EPA agrees, however, that this approach addresses only one use siteor a limited number of use sites of a pesticide at a time, which allowsthe potential exposure of a listed species to pesticide uses not includedin the cluster. In contrast to the cluster approach, a species-based approach will givepriority to those species in most need of protection. This approach wasthe one favored by most of the comments and is therefore likely to gainuser acceptance, which is necessary to the success of any program designedto protect listed species. The individual pesticide approach does not address the listed species thatmay be potentially exposed to harmful pesticides that are not scheduledfor review. If this approach were implemented, progress toward protectinglisted species would be slow. However, this approach completely addressesall registered use sites and the associated species and could encouragethe development of pesticide-specific measures to reduce the risk to listedspecies. Yet, this method may not allow for appropriate recommendationson pesticide alternatives because the alternative pesticide may not havebeen reviewed and could be equally as hazardous to the species. Initially, EPA rejected a species approach for two major reasons. Mostimportantly, reinitiation of consultation on pesticides affecting onlysome species would result in a program that would not allow for the timelyimplementation of many existing reasonable and prudent actions. The EPA'slegal obligations require that the Biological Opinions declaring jeopardyor specifying measures to reduce incidental take be addressed and the reasonableand prudent actions be implemented as soon as feasible. Also, EPA believedthat insufficient information was available on which pesticide uses arespecifically associated with the habitats of listed species. However, after further evaluation, EPA believes that a type of speciesapproach is the most appropriate for biological consultation and is proposingsuch an approach. To deal with existing Biological Opinions in a timelyfashion, EPA proposes to reinitiate consultation on pesticides that couldimpact affected species. After this initial phase, EPA would consult onpesticides potentially affecting additional priority species. In addition,although the uses specifically associated with the habitat of the speciesmay not be known, EPA will be identifying uses in the vicinity of the species(counties). b. <T3>Alternatives to prohibition of use. </T3>Many comments indicated thatuse prohibitions should be considered only if no other alternative wasavailable, which would allow some continued use of a pesticide while stillprotecting the species. In addition, any limitations on use should onlybe applied if efficacious alternatives also are provided at the same time.Alternatives could include changing application methods; reducing maximumapplication rates; changing application timing (hourly, daily, or seasonally);and changing product formulations. Various comments indicated that thesealternatives should be developed by EPA, the Cooperative Extension Service,State wildlife agencies, local pesticide users, and/or registrants throughsite-specific planning efforts. In contrast, other comments indicated that only use prohibitions are adequateto protect listed species because the loss of some members of the speciesmay lead to extinction. The comments supporting only use prohibitions indicateda concern for a lack of practical means to enforce alternatives to useprohibitions. Comments also recommended severe penalties for gross negligence.<T3>Response: </T3>The EPA proposes to seek alternatives to prohibitionsof use whenever feasible. The EPA must evaluate the effectiveness of thesealternatives to protect listed species and consider questions regardingtheir implementation, enforcement, efficacy, and legality. The specificways in which EPA is investigating these alternatives are described inUnits III and VI in this document. Specifically, this proposal includes calculating threshold applicationrates when making ``may affect'' determinations, thus placing emphasison reduced application rates in lieu of complete prohibitions of use wherefeasible to minimize use impacts while providing adequate protection tolisted species. The EPA intends that the public participation procedures in the Programwill provide the opportunity for all interested parties to contribute tothe development of these alternatives. For example, opportunities for submitting suggestions for reasonable andprudent alternatives and measures include the public notification 30 daysprior to initiating consultation with FWS, and after a Biological Opinionis issued. EPA plans to make the information contained in the BiologicalOpinions available to the public for comment before imposing enforceablelimitations. In addition, EPA strongly supports state-initiated plan development andencourages public comments at various stages in the process, includingobtaining information related to alternatives to use prohibition. Supportfor state-initiated plan development will encourage the development ofalternatives at the local and/or state level. The EPA intends that state-initiatedplans be developed with the active participation of state wildlife andagricultural agencies, local pesticide user groups, and other state andlocal groups interested in the success of the Program.The EPA also intends to work with registrants to encourage them to developmeans to avoid ``may affect'' determinations by investigating reducingapplication rates, substituting application methods which reduce exposure,and others. Finally,  EPA will make a special effort to work with USDAto increase the range of alternatives that may be available to users. Thiseffort includes work done through the Interagency Task Groups.7. <T3>Labeling/map/bulletin implementation.</T3> The EPA received many commentson its plans to implement the Endangered Species Protection Program througha labeling/map/bulletin approach.a. <T3>Labeling/bulletin approach.</T3> Some comments indicated that labelsof affected products should carry a generic statement rather than listeach county in which pesticide use limitations apply. Others indicatedthat a generic statement regarding protection of listed species shouldbe included on all pesticide products, whether or not they have been determinedto cause jeopardy. Still others recommended alternatives to the labeling/bulletinapproach in general. These alternatives are discussed in response to comment8.<T3>Response:</T3> Advances in science and technology and the relativelynew identification of local and regional environmental concerns on whichEPA is focusing attention demonstrate the need to approach some issuesfrom a geographic perspective. The EPA has been exploring different methodsof accommodating geographical or regional differences for several of itsmore recent initiatives and believes that the proposed labeling/bulletinapproach is an innovative and effective method of conveying county-specificinformation to pesticide users. Within the labeling/bulletin approach,EPA currently favors a generic label statement approach, but believes thecooperation of the pesticide industry is essential to implementing suchan approach.As explained in Unit III of this Notice, the revisions and refinementsin EPA's revised proposed Program are expected to reduce limitations onpesticide use from those resulting from EPA's previously proposed Program.However, EPA does not yet possess definitive information regarding thedegree to which limitations may be reduced. The number of counties in whichlimitations will initially apply and in how many counties use of a givenproduct may be limited, will not be available until EPA completes its consultationwith the FWS. Therefore, EPA considered information derived from its previousefforts to implement an Endangered Species Protection Program, for purposesof comparing an approach using labeling consisting of county lists witha generic label statement approach.Under the previously proposed Program, labeling of affected products wouldcontain a list of counties in which use limitations applied. In addition,the labeling would contain a generic statement requiring pesticide usersin a listed county to obtain and comply with limitations described in theappropriate Bulletin.Based on the Program EPA previously began to implement, users of affectedpesticides in a total of 910 counties (approximately 30 percent of countiesin the country) would have been required to obtain Bulletins. Of thoserequired to obtain Bulletins, a portion would have found that no limitationson use applied at their specific application site. If the county list isdeleted, leaving only the generic label statement, pesticide users of affectedproducts would be required to obtain a Bulletin even if no limitationsapplied throughout the county. Based on the previous Program, limitationswould not apply in approximately 70 percent of the counties.The EPA agrees with comments that indicate the effectiveness of the Programmay decline if pesticide users are inconvenienced to a great degree inattempting to comply with requirements of the Program. The EPA therefore,must weigh the consumer response that may result from adopting the genericlabel statement approach, against the overall Program benefits of suchan approach.The EPA believes that measures to protect listed species may be effectivemore readily if the generic label approach is adopted. Under such an approach,once a product is labeled, protective measures for new species in new countiescan be implemented through changes in the Bulletin without waiting forfurther label revisions to appear on products in the marketplace. The timenecessary to incorporate new counties on labeling that contains a listof counties (generally 12 months), and the time estimated for productsin the marketplace to be used (generally 24 months), could result in differentcontainers of the same product having different county lists on the labelingat the same time. The EPA believes that a certain degree of the confusionwhich may result in such cases would be eliminated through the use of thegeneric label statement approach.In addition, the administrative difficulties to EPA and the States to modifyBulletins, issue changes to registrants to add or delete counties fromlabeling and to monitor and enforce the requirements to change the listsmay become extreme as additional listed species are considered for inclusionin a Program involving county lists on pesticide labeling.The EPA currently favors the generic labeling/bulletin approach becauseof the flexibility it provides in administering the Program and in addingor deleting counties from the Program based on changes in species habitatand status. The EPA proposes to take the following actions to mitigatesome of the disadvantages of this approach. First, the generic statementwould not require a pesticide user to obtain a Bulletin, but instead wouldrequire the user to comply with the limitations in the Bulletin. This modificationwould permit pesticide users to determine whether they need to have theinformation, without going out of their way to locate the Bulletin itself.For instance, a user could place a phone call to his/her pesticide retailer,the Cooperative Extension Service, or the EPA to determine whether limitationsapplied within the county.Second, EPA will work with representatives of the pesticide industry duringthe 1989 and 1990 Interim Program period to determine an effective methodof distributing Bulletins and information about which counties are affectedand which are not. Unless an information distribution system is developedthat minimizes the potential burden on the pesticide users in the manycounties in which limitations do not apply, EPA will seriously considerlisting counties on the labeling of affected products. The EPA welcomescomment on its proposal and welcomes information on potential distributionmethods for Bulletins and other information.b. <T3>Maps.</T3> Many comments indicated that the maps of the habitats currentlyoccupied by listed species, intended for use in Bulletins, need to be moreaccurate. This would make the Program more credible to pesticide users.For example, the maps should not extend currently occupied habitats tothe ``nearest recognizable boundary,'' but only describe the area actuallyoccupied. It was also suggested that maps should be supplemented or replacedby a description of habitats and pictures of the species and/or their habitats.Other comments indicated that FWS should prepare the maps and descriptionsof habitats and use standard buffer zones across the country, unless locallyspecific circumstances justify a variation. One comment requested thatEPA and FWS develop a national computer-based Geographic Information System(GIS) to locate the listed species and relevant pesticide uses.In contrast, other comments were concerned that mapping could harm somelisted species by making their locations known to collectors or vandals.<T3>Response: </T3>The EPA agrees that the maps need to be more accurate.The EPA is working closely with FWS, USDA, and the states to obtain moreaccurate information on the location of listed species and to ensure thatthe maps reflect currently occupied habitat. In all cases, each map willbe reviewed by FWS, other appropriate Federal agencies, states, and otherinterested parties prior to use of the map in an enforceable Program. Habitat locations will not be extended to the nearest recognizable boundariesunless no other enforceable alternative is available to identify the areain such a way that a pesticide user can determine use limitations. The EPA will use habitat descriptions when they are available and appropriate.The EPA is working with FWS, USDA, and the states to ensure that thesedescriptions are understandable to the user. These descriptions will beused in lieu of or as a supplement to the habitat maps. Pictures or illustrationsalso may be used when available and appropriate, to more specifically identifythe areas in which use limitations apply. The FWS is utilizing standard buffer zones, when such zones are necessary.However, if circumstances dictate that a different buffer zone is necessaryfor protecting a species, FWS will modify their standard buffer zone toaccommodate the specific circumstances. The EPA is working in conjunction with the U.S. Geological Survey to identifyspecific mapping needs for EPA. These needs include a computer-based datasystem for geographic information. However, it is not anticipated thatthe additional needed data will be developed before 1990. The FWS has acomputer-based information system on federally listed species which hasthe capability of including and interfacing with GIS. However, availabilityof the system to other Federal or state agencies, as well as the long termdevelopment and support by the FWS of this system is not certain. The EPAmay have to develop this information independently if funding permits.Finally, EPA also is concerned about disclosing information on listed specieswhich might make them vulnerable to collectors and vandals. Mapping certainspecies may contribute to their destruction. For species that FWS determinesare vulnerable to threats from collection, FWS will suggest reasonableand prudent actions that do not rely on mapping. The EPA welcomes suggestionsfor alternatives for identifying areas where pesticide use limitationsare necessary. 8. <T3>Alternatives to the labeling/bulletin/map implementation approach:</T3>The EPA received a variety of suggested alternatives related to theimplementation approach described in the FR Notice (53 FR 7717). a. <T3>Voluntary program. </T3>Some comments indicated that the EndangeredSpecies Protection Program should be a voluntary program since labelingwill not be effective. <T3>Response: </T3>While EPA acknowledges the degree to which it must relyon the willing efforts of pesticide users to protect listed species fromharm, EPA does not believe that its obligations under the ESA would befulfilled through a program that relies solely on voluntary participation.The EPA has considered the various approaches and will implement a programwith an enforcement component. b. <T3>Restricted use. </T3>Comments recommended that pesticide products posingjeopardy to listed species should be classified as restricted use whichwould ensure training and certification of users of the products. <T3>Response: </T3>The EPA does not believe that restricted use classificationis an appropriate or effective means to protect listed species from harmresulting from pesticide use. Under FIFRA section 3(d)(1)(C), EPA may classify a pesticide as restricteduse if unreasonable adverse effects to the environment may result evenwhen the product is used according to directions, cautions and warnings,or in accordance with a widespread and commonly recognized practice. TheEPA has developed regulations that indicate the levels of toxicity andhazard above which the unreasonable adverse effects criteria may be met.Unless a product meets these existing regulatory and statutory criteriaand guidance for classification as restricted use, EPA will not so classifya product. Further, in cases where classification of a product as restricted use isappropriate, that classification alone would not be an effective meansto protect listed species. Specific use limitations, about which CertifiedApplicators could be trained, would still be necessary. However, EPA recognizes the value of training to enhance understandingof and compliance with use limitations to protect listed species. Therefore,EPA's Certification and Training Branch in OPP is working to include listedspecies protection among the topics about which Certified Applicators receivetraining. c. <T3>Delegation of authority to states. </T3>Some comments indicated thatstates should prescribe the conditions of pesticide use. Therefore, productlabels should simply refer users to the state lead agencies for furtherinstructions. <T3>Response: </T3>Section 7 of the ESA specifically provides that Federalagencies must ensure that the actions they authorize will not jeopardizelisted species. Therefore, EPA must implement a Federal program which ensuresprotection for listed species. The EPA also believes, however, that statesmay better determine methods to afford protection to listed species withinthe state. Therefore, EPA has provided each state the opportunity to developa state-initiated plan for protection of listed species and to proposethat plan to EPA for adoption within the state. d. <T3>Preserves and easements. </T3>Comments suggested that preserves beestablished on public lands to protect listed species, and pesticide usebe limited only if preserves cannot be established. Other comments suggestedthat EPA should purchase environmental easements to protect listed species.<T3>Response: </T3>The intent of the ESA is to conserve the species andthe habitats on which they depend. Therefore, FWS policy is not to introducespecies into non-historic range. Under the land acquisition provisionsof ESA, priority is given to habitats already occupied by the species,since other habitats may not have the biological attributes necessary forthe species to survive and recover. Although environmental easements may provide protection, EPA's responsibilitiesunder FIFRA and the ESA are for protection of listed species from pesticides,not from all threats. The EPA considers that the Endangered Species ProtectionProgram proposed in this Notice is sufficient to fulfill its responsibilitiesunder section 7 of the ESA for pesticide registration. e. <T3>Management plans and landowner contracts. </T3>Some comments recommendedthat individual management plans and contracts with landowners should bedeveloped. <T3>Response: </T3>The EPA believes that this approach has merit in somecases, but would not be viable on a national basis. Some states are exploringthis method of protecting listed species. If proposed to EPA as part ofa state-initiated plan, EPA in consultation with the FWS will determinewhether in that particular state, the management plan or landowner contractwill serve as reasonable and prudent actions to protect the listed species.When a favorable determination is made, EPA would implement the plan withinthe state. f. <T3>Permit system. </T3>Several comments suggested using a county permitsystem such as the one used in California. <T3>Response: </T3>California is unique in its system of county agriculturecommissioners and in requiring permits prior to pesticide use. While issuingpermits in the State of California may work effectively, other states maynot have the mechanisms or resources to introduce such measures. Sincethe Endangered Species Protection Program is a national program, EPA mustensure that its applicability is far reaching. However, if other statespropose such a permitting system under a state-initiated plan, EPA in consultationwith FWS will consider whether the system would be a reasonable and prudentaction to protect listed species in that state. 9. <T3>Enforcement. </T3>Some comments recommended that FWS should conductall enforcement actions related to the harming of listed species, whileproduct misuse should remain with EPA. Other comments indicated that EPAshould establish a strong compliance program to support the product labeling.Still other comments indicated that applicators should be required to showrecords of having obtained information on the proper use of the specificpesticides subject to limitations to protect listed species. Comments alsorecommended that EPA should conduct a pilot program with several statesto test the Program's effectiveness with users, prior to full nationalimplementation. <T3>Response: </T3>The EPA will not attempt to enforce against the takingof a listed species. However, FWS could take enforcement action againstunlawful taking under ESA, whether harm to the species was a result ofpesticide use or any other activity. As with all labeling and use provisions, EPA will enforce the pesticideuse limitations for listed species that result from Biological Opinionsand the labeling requirements to ensure that a product registration remainsin compliance with FIFRA. Enforcement will be carried out by the statesthrough existing enforcement cooperative agreements with EPA. Where suchagreements do not exist, EPA will enforce these provisions. With regard to requiring applicators to show records pertaining to informationon proper use, section 11 of FIFRA prohibits EPA from issuing regulationswhich require the private applicator to maintain any records or file anyreports or other documents. The EPA plans to initiate three types of pilot programs, which are describedin Unit V of this document. These pilots include special project pilots,state-initiated plan pilots, and Federal program pilots. 10. <T3>Education and training. </T3>Some comments recommended that registrants,the Cooperative Extension Service, state/Federal wildlife agencies, theFWS, and others be involved in education and training efforts. For example,FWS should provide education on ESA, including an explanation of the processthrough which species become listed. Comments also recommended that the Program should provide users with 1year of education before initiating enforceable labeling for each pesticideaffected by use limitations. Other comments indicated that EPA or FWS shouldestablish a national toll free telephone number for pesticide users toobtain species and use limitation information. This service also couldbe provided by electronic bulletin board. <T3>Response: </T3>The EPA agrees that a wide variety of people shouldbe involved in education and training efforts. For example, FWS and USDAare already involved in the Interagency Outreach and Education Task Group,which is charged with developing education and training materials for thepublic. This Task Group also will seek to provide opportunities for othergroups to participate. In addition, EPA is working through its Certificationand Training Branch to ensure that, in the future, certified applicatortraining will include information related to listed species protection.While EPA agrees that training and education efforts are important forpesticide users, EPA does not see the need to provide 1 year of educationbefore initiating enforceable labeling for each pesticide affected by uselimitations. However, EPA is planning in the Interim Program for educationand training in the 1989 and 1990 growing season so that users should becomfortable with the manner in which the Program operates, well beforeenforceable labeling is in the marketplace. The EPA believes that its trainingand education efforts on a national basis should provide users with theinformation necessary to understand the Program.The Outreach and Education and Technical Task Groups are considering anational toll free telephone number and other electronic media to assistusers, but have not made a final decision at this time. 11. <T3>Funding. </T3>Many comments indicated that state and local effortsshould be funded by the Federal government. Such efforts could includeverifying the extent of species habitats and developing alternatives toany national limitations on use. <T3>Response: </T3>The EPA must move forward with a program to protectlisted species to fulfill its obligations under ESA. The EPA is makingevery effort to provide the states with an opportunity to participate.However, compliance with ESA does not depend upon the availability of fundingfor state and local participation in the Program. Listed species must beprotected in any case. Recently, EPA has been able to fund several specialprojects on a limited basis under a grant program administered throughthe FIFRA Office of Compliance Monitoring. Of the 12 special projects fundedfor FY'89, 5 are related to protecting listed species. Unit V providesmore detail regarding these projects. In the President's 1990 budget, submittedto Congress, EPA requested $7 million for the states to use in developingprograms to protect listed species, farm worker safety, and groundwaterprotection in the pesticides area. 12. <T3>Guidelines for state-initiated plans. </T3>The majority of the commentsfavored EPA issuing guidelines for developing state-initiated plans, butfelt that they should be advisory rather than requirements. The guidelinesshould list state responsibilities in such areas as mapping, research,enforcement, and technical assistance. Others felt that such guidelineswould hinder creativity. <T3>Response: </T3>The EPA chose not to issue guidelines because EPA didnot want to stifle creative and innovative approaches by states in addressingunique circumstances. However, guidelines for state-initiated plans to protect listed specieswere developed by the Association of American Pest Control Officials, Inc.and sent to the states. These guidelines, although brief, outline proceduralsteps for preparing and submitting a state-initiated plan. The guidelinesrecommend that a plan contain several items. First, they should containa list of sites, species, and pesticides for which the state has developedalternative protective measures that are different from those proposedby EPA. Second, they should include a brief description of the reason foreach listing and the adverse impact of complete prohibition in the rangeof the listed species. Third, alternative protective measures should berecommended for each listed species, and fourth, an assessment of the impactof the recommended alternatives to protect listed species should be provided.Fifth, the state-initiated plan should identify the resources committedto implementing the approved alternative program. Finally, procedures forperiodic review and update of the plan should be included. The EPA intends to work with the states which are or may be developingstate-initiated plans on a case-by-case basis to determine if additionalguidance is needed. 13. <T3>State-initiated plans. </T3>Some comments objected to state-initiatedplans because such plans would promote inconsistency in pesticide use limitations.Others indicated that EPA's national limitations should be imposed untilstate-initiated plans are approved rather than deferring EPA's limitationsduring the state planning process. <T3>Response: </T3>Once national limitations are imposed, they will continueuntil state-initiated plans are approved. State-initiated plans will identifymeans to protect species specific to the state and habitat. The EPA recognizesthere may be a number of methods suitable to protect listed species. Whilespecific limitations may vary from state to state, consistent implementationthrough Bulletins will help to mitigate potential confusion. 14. <T3>Consistency with Federal/state programs. </T3>Many comments reflecteda concern that potential conflicts with other agencies and programs needto be resolved before the Endangered Species Protection Program is implemented.Specific areas identified included agricultural research and demonstrationprojects; bird control; boll weevil and gypsy moth control; conservationreserves; crop insurance; the Migratory Bird Treaty Act; mosquito abatement;noxious weed, rights-of-way, and rodent control; soil conservation; andsurface mine reclamation. Other comments recommended that EPA survey other Federal agencies usingpesticides to ensure that they do not jeopardize listed species. <T3>Response: </T3>The EPA does not plan to survey other Federal agencieswhich use pesticides. The EPA does not anticipate that many conflicts willarise because Federal agencies, including EPA, are required to adhere tothe procedures and limitations provided by section 7 of ESA. As a result,an agency which has completed a formal section 7 consultation is requiredto follow the procedures and limitations provided by FWS in that consultation.If an agency has not completed a consultation, the agency must still conformto the requirements of ESA and comply with the instructions on productlabeling and in Bulletins. 15. <T3>Inert ingredients. </T3>Comments recommended that EPA include inertingredients in the ``may affect'' screening procedures. <T3>Response: </T3>The EPA has identified pesticide inert ingredients thatare of toxicological concern, and as a result, has requested ecologicaleffects data on these inert ingredients. Depending on the results of thesestudies, EPA will request consultation as appropriate.16. <T3>Special Local Need Registrations and Emergency Exemptions. </T3>Somecomments indicated that EPA should only approve a Special Local Need Registration(section 24(c)) or Emergency Exemption (section 18), if no adverse impacton listed species occurs. <T3>Response: </T3>The EPA does consider the effect of Special Local NeedRegistrations and Emergency Exemptions on listed species. In general, theseactions must avoid exposure to listed species; if the action ``may affect''listed species, EPA consults with FWS. 17. <T3>Public participation. </T3>Many comments concerned EPA's process fordetermining that a pesticide ``may affect'' a listed species. Commentsrecommended that the public should be involved in EPA's ``may affect''determinations and FWS's Biological Opinions, including draft BiologicalOpinions. Comments also recommended that EPA's ``may affect'' determinationsand FWS's Biological Opinions should be reviewed through a peer reviewprocess similar to that used by EPA's FIFRA Scientific Advisory Panel.Comments indicated that states should be given the opportunity to reviewmaps, alternative control measures, and other major decisions in the Program.Registrants, environmental groups, university staff, and USDA should alsobe included in the development and review of alternative measures. Comments also recommended that hearings should be held in the local areasaffected by the Program prior to its implementation, and that all affectedlandowners should be notified of the Program's limitations in writing.Comments suggested that EPA should create a national advisory task forceto assist in developing the Program. The FWS similarly should establishadvisory panels on species mapping. The FWS needs to prepare public informationmaterials on how to list and delist a particular species. <T3>Response: </T3>In general, EPA agrees with the need for public participationin the Endangered Species Protection Program and has identified areas throughoutthis document where public participation may be helpful. Specifically,Units III and V of this document describe in more detail some of the areasin which EPA is encouraging public participation. For example, EPA intends to provide public notification of its ``may affect''determinations 30 days prior to reinitiating or initiating consultationwith FWS and encourages suggestions regarding reasonable and prudent actions.Also, EPA will provide opportunity for public participation on the mapsand information related to the Bulletins. Through the Interagency TaskGroups, EPA is trying to ensure that the appropriate people will be contacted.As soon as maps of listed species habitats are developed, all affectedstates will have an opportunity for additional review. Once FWS providesa Biological Opinion with information on potential use limitations, speciespotentially jeopardized, and reasonable and prudent actions, additionalopportunity for comment will be available. The EPA plans to include an address in the Bulletins, whether issued duringthe Interim Program or after the Program is final, where comments can besubmitted. All comments will be considered. The EPA does not agree that it would be appropriate to establish a peerreview process for each of its ``may affect'' determinations. The EPA followsprocedures in its ``Standard Evaluation Procedure for Ecological Risk Assessment''(Ref. l) in developing ``may affect'' determinations. This document hasundergone peer review, including a review by the FIFRA Scientific AdvisoryPanel. In light of these previous peer reviews concerning criteria andprocesses for determining whether a pesticide use ``may affect'' listedspecies, EPA believes that additional or separate peer reviews for eachindividual determination are not necessary and not an appropriate use ofresources, and would unduly delay implementation of the Program. The EPA intends to have an aggressive outreach program. While EPA cannotagree to hold local hearings in each area affected by the Program priorto its implementation or to notify individually all affected landowners,the information which is critical to the success of the Program will bedistributed through several important avenues as discussed elsewhere inthis document. These avenues may include the EPA Regional Offices, states,information networks of USDA, and pesticide dealers and distributors.The EPA has debated the desirability of establishing a National Task Forceto assist in development of the Endangered Species Protection Program.The EPA believes that most issues appropriate for the attention of sucha task force have been resolved through public comments and participationin development of the revised proposed Program by other Federal and stateagencies, public interest groups, pesticide users, the regulated communityand the general public. While specific details of implementation, suchas distribution mechanisms for Bulletins, have not been fully resolved,EPA believes the most effective approach to these issues will be to workindividually with various interests to gain their support and cooperationand to obtain their input regarding how EPA may accomplish its objectivesin this area. Therefore, EPA will not establish a National Task Force forthe Endangered Species Protection Program at this time.18. <T3>Monitoring studies. </T3>Comments recommended that EPA should monitoror require monitoring on the ecological impacts of pesticides to verifywhether they threaten listed species under actual use conditions. Expandedresearch on estimating actual exposure should be conducted.<T3>Response: </T3>The EPA can require monitoring studies in specific situations.Procedures and guidelines for monitoring studies are under developmentfor those situations in which a monitoring requirement is warranted. Inaddition, EPA may obtain actual exposure and ecological impact data fromaquatic and terrestrial field studies for more toxic pesticides. However,such studies must be conducted where listed species that may be affecteddo not occur. Such monitoring or field studies would provide informationfor non-listed species that may be useful for assessing effects on listedspecies. However, it normally would be contrary to EPA to conduct suchstudies where listed species could be affected.19. <T3>Pesticide half-lives. </T3>Comments indicated that EPA's EEC modelshould consider the half-lives of pesticide residues in the environmentin calculating the potential exposure to listed species.<T3>Response: </T3>In EPA's exposure assessments, current label informationis used to estimate EEC's. Where actual field data, including informationon half-lives, on EEC's are available and applicable to listed species,these data are used. However, actual residue data are not usually available.The EPA is continually working to refine its models for estimating concentrations.Since valid environmental fate data often are not available, registrantsare being required to fill data gaps as part of EPA's reregistration process.The EPA will make use of the best available information to assess impactson listed species. As new data become available, they will be incorporatedinto assessments.20. <T3>Data needs. </T3>Comments indicated the need for expanded researchin such areas as verifying habitats, evaluating probable pesticide impacts,and identifying current pesticide use patterns. Comments recommended thatEPA should require monitoring and reporting of pesticide use to verifycompliance with the Program.<T3>Response:</T3> The EPA recognizes the need for more data on specieshabitats and locations and thus has requested assistance from USDA, FWS,states, and others to obtain such information. Similarly, through the interagencyefforts, EPA is working to obtain pesticide use information that is applicableto listed species locations.21. <T3>New test procedures.</T3> Comments indicated that EPA should have moretoxicity research and develop new test procedures for representative speciesof wildlife to improve the EPA's ``may affect'' determinations.<T3>Response: </T3>The EPA routinely requires ecological toxicity dataon a variety of species to support pesticide registration. (See Unit VI.B.of this document.) Because it is not feasible to test all species thatmay be affected by pesticides, EPA uses toxicity data on surrogate speciesto represent species that are not tested directly, including listed species.The EPA acknowledges the need for an expanded toxicity data base for somepesticides and has proposed test methods and requirements for additionalspecies (53 FR 20012). In addition, EPA has funded research to developtest methods for other species, such as freshwater mollusks, that may beused as more appropriate surrogates for certain listed species. Finally,EPA laboratories have initiated research on environmental fate and exposuredata that will be used to refine EEC calculations.Such additional information would be useful to help EPA make more sophisticatedrisk analyses and decisions. In addition to research conducted or fundedby EPA, data needs have been transmitted to the National Agricultural ChemicalsAssociation. Until such additional information becomes available, EPA usesthe risk assessment techniques explained in Unit VI to fulfill its obligationsto use the best available information in consultations with the FWS.<ITAG tagnum="84">V. Interim Program</ITAG>Until such time as enforceable measures of EPA's Endangered Species ProtectionProgram are in place, EPA is planning to initiate an Interim Program. Thisis a voluntary program designed to accomplish three goals:(1) Protect listed species from pesticides that have resulted in BiologicalOpinions identifying reasonable and prudent actions.(2) Refine specific program direction.(3) Prepare for full implementation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">These goals will be reached through involvement in and evaluationof a series of pilot programs, educational efforts, and requests for furtherpublic, state, and regional input.A. Pilot Programs The EPA intends to be involved in three related, but separate pilot effortsduring this Interim Program which include: (1) special project pilots,(2) state-initiated plan pilots, and (3) Federal Program pilots. In allcases, EPA will seek information from involved parties in an effort toevaluate various approaches to protection of listed species. In addition,several pilots may yield information that is generic in its usefulnessin developing measures to protect listed species in other locations. <T3>1. Special project pilots. </T3>The EPA has funded several specialprojects for 1989 to 1990 under the Enforcement Cooperative Agreement Programadministered through the EPA's Office of Compliance Monitoring. Statessubmitted proposals for special projects to EPA. The EPA reviewed and ratedthese proposals and determined which would be funded. Five of the 12 specialprojects funded in FY '89 relate in some way to listed species protection.The EPA will work through its Regional Offices and with the involved statesto evaluate the success of the special projects in those states that areexploring alternative methods to protect listed species. In addition, EPAwill evaluate any information resulting from the special projects to determineutility to the Endangered Species Protection Program. a. <T3>California Department of Food and Agriculture. </T3>The CaliforniaDepartment of Food and Agriculture (CDFA) intends to develop a model programfor gathering local data on approximately 45 listed species and their habitats.Information will be collected on local pesticide use, terrain, and climate;measures will be developed which CDFA believes will mitigate pesticideexposure. Part of the final CDFA project will be refined maps of listedspecies habitats. From analyses of habitats, adjacent pesticide use sites,and other factors that influence exposure of the species to pesticides,specific recommendations will be formulated to protect listed species inCalifornia. Since CDFA's efforts will address approximately 45 species,specific information may result which will be useful in other geographicareas where these species are found. In addition, procedures for habitatanalysis, mapping, and information gathering will be reviewed to determinetheir applicability to other states or counties. If these procedures aredetermined to be of value in developing reasonable and prudent actionsthat are less limiting than those developed at the Federal level, but stillprotective of the listed species, EPA will share this information withother states and consider it in developing the Federal Program. The CDFAproject also includes an effort to conduct a small field survey to determinethe adequacy of pesticide labeling precautions to protect listed species.The information derived from this work will be directly useful to EPA inevaluating its own labeling approach. b. <T3>Minnesota Department of Agriculture. </T3>Two of the seven federallylisted species that are found in Minnesota (the Minnesota trout lily andthe prairie bush-clover), have been identified as being jeopardized bycertain pesticide use. Both species are found in rather isolated areasof certain rural counties, mostly on privately owned land with residentowners. Given this situation, Minnesota is proposing to develop and enterinto ``protection agreements'' with landowners at each site. The agreementswill be site-specific management plans to protect the species, requiringlandowners to implement various provisions such as posting signs, monitoringthe listed species population at least once a year, and reporting problemsto FWS. A key element of this approach is the one-on-one personal contactof the state with the landowners, and the resulting opportunities for offeringeducation and support, and for monitoring good management practices. The EPA does not believe such an approach will work in many cases wherespecies are very numerous or transient. However, EPA does not have thenecessary experience to determine to what extent such an approach couldserve as reasonable and prudent actions for protecting listed species.Through information obtained under the Minnesota grant, we hope to be ableto better define the types of situations that may lend themselves to suchan approach. Whether the state was able to contact owners of all land onwhich the two listed species occur, how many of those owners were willingto cooperate, whether the landowners agreeing to such an approach wouldhave been affected by Federal limitations on pesticide use to protect listedspecies, and resources required to carry out such an approach are all parametersthat would allow EPA to better define the utility of ``protection agreements''within the context of its Endangered Species Protection Program. c. <T3>Puerto Rico Department of Agriculture. </T3>Puerto Rico's project isintended to obtain pesticide usage and crop data in the area surroundingthe site on which the species exists, to develop an experimental designfor sampling, to collect and analyze samples, and to draw conclusions andrecommendations regarding use of pesticides in the area. One species willbe chosen for this project in the near future. An outline of the projectand methodology will be produced for potential use by other states. d. <T3>Inter Tribal Council of Arizona. </T3>The Inter Tribal Council of Arizonawill form a working group on which individual tribes will have representation.The working group will identify listed species on each Arizona reservationand develop a model Endangered Species Tribal Plan. This plan will includemaps of species habitat, enforcement matrices, and model ordinances toprotect listed species. In addition, the working group will provide technicalassistance in developing tribe-specific plans. The EPA will review the recommendations of the Inter Tribal-Council ofArizona in terms of the potential applicability of those recommendationsto other areas and will assist in obtaining FWS review of the recommendationsto determine whether they can be considered reasonable and prudent actionsfor protection of listed species.e. <T3>Florida Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services. </T3>The FloridaDepartment of Agriculture and Consumer Services will develop advanced pesticidemanagement techniques through use of a computerized Geographic InformationSystem (GIS). The GIS allows many distinct data bases to be superimposedand displayed graphically. It also offers decisionmakers an opportunityto view and evaluate multiple geographic parameters (soil type, land use,etc.) concurrently on a regional or site-specific basis. Among other thingsthe GIS will be used for identification and graphic display of geographiczones where groundwater protection and listed species protection zonesoverlap agricultural and other land-use data that are categorized basedon crop site and pesticide use patterns, to target enforcement and monitoringefforts. The EPA hopes to obtain information from Florida's efforts in this area,regarding the feasibility of developing GIS approaches at the Federal levelto support the Endangered Species Protection Program. Through the experienceof Florida, EPA can begin to assess the technical difficulties that maybe encountered, the resource implications and the overall utility of sucha system. 2. <T3>State-initiated plans. </T3>The EPA provided the states with an opportunityto initiate plans for protection of listed species within the states. Theseplans, if acceptable in terms of implementation and protection of listedspecies, will be adopted by EPA as Federal requirements within that state.For states that submit timely plans, EPA will work with them to pilot theapproach within the state on a voluntary basis. By so doing, EPA, FWS,and the state can evaluate the plan to determine its effectiveness in protectinglisted species, how well its provisions are understood by pesticide users,and whether implementation of the plan will fulfill the goals of the EndangeredSpecies Protection Program. The EPA is working through its Regional offices to determine which statesare prepared to pilot all or parts of the plan they initiated. As statesare identified, EPA will work closely with them to implement as a pilotand to evaluate their recommended measures to protect listed species. 3. <T3>Federal Program pilots. </T3>In addition to piloting state-initiatedplans, EPA will pilot its overall approach to protect listed species wherewe have consulted with FWS and identified those pesticides for which uselimitations are necessary. The Federal Program will be piloted only instates that indicate a willingness to participate. Pilot efforts of theFederal Program within the states will be voluntary on the part of thestate governments and on the part of pesticide users, unless the statewishes to implement an enforceable program. In order to conduct these pilotprograms, EPA will have to work very closely with each state participatingto determine the most appropriate methods within each state for providinginformation to pesticide users, encouraging use of the information, andevaluating the Program. The EPA will encourage extensive state involvementsince increased state participation and involvement may result in pilotsthat are more effective and revealing in terms of the effectiveness ofthe Endangered Species Protection Program. B. Education and Outreach Efforts The EPA will develop pilot-specific educational information to supportthe Interim Program. In addition, the Interagency Outreach and EducationTask Group is also developing and reviewing information related to theEndangered Species Protection Program. For each state participating in a pilot program, EPA will work with thestate to develop informational materials to explain the specific Programto the public and to encourage participation and further input from thoseactually involved in the Program. C. Public Participation The EPA supports continued public involvement in and comment on the EndangeredSpecies Protection Program. The EPA is initiating several efforts specificallyto obtain further input during the Interim Program. The EPA believes that species maps and information regarding potentialreasonable and prudent actions are valuable as an educational tool forthe public in addition to being the favored method for describing pesticideuse limitations. As soon as FWS provides maps of listed species habitats,EPA will ensure that all affected states have an opportunity to reviewthe maps. Further, when FWS identifies information on potential limitationsof pesticide use, species potentially jeopardized and reasonable and prudentactions, this information will be distributed for public consideration.The purpose of this distribution is to inform affected parties of potentiallimitations, to obtain comments on the accuracy of the information, andto encourage voluntary use of the information to assess more realisticallythe impact the proposed limitations may have on the user. In addition,EPA will solicit geographically-specific, reasonable and prudent actionsfor consideration. <ITAG tagnum="84">VI. Additional Technical Background Information </ITAG>A. Consultation Procedures Regulations governing ESA's section 7 consultation procedures pursuantto section 7 of ESA are codified in 50 CFR Part 402. A discussion of theseregulations in reference to EPA's registration and reregistration activitiesfollows. 1. A ``conference'' is designed to identify potential problems betweenan agency action, such as pesticide registration, and a species proposedto be listed (i.e., before it is listed) under ESA. There is also a moreformal conference procedure (50 CFR 402.10 (d) and (e)), which followsthe same basic procedures as a formal consultation, except that again thespecies is not yet listed. The EPA hopes to make use of formal conferencesin the future, where appropriate, to provide more timely protection tolisted species. 2. An ``early consultation'' attempts to identify potential conflicts betweenlisted species and their critical habitats, and proposed actions priorto applying for the Federal pesticide registration. This type of consultationis conducted between the Federal agency, EPA, and FWS, but involves theregistrant or applicant throughout the process. Pesticide registrationhas not used early consultation because the amount and quality of dataneeded from the registrant would be equivalent to that needed for registration,and the process would provide no benefit. Aspects of this consultationprocedure (i.e., early involvement of the applicant) can be useful in expeditingpublic health emergency exemption consultations. 3. A ``biological assessment'' evaluates the potential effects of Federalaction(s) on listed species, species that are proposed to be listed, andtheir critical habitats. The goal is to determine which species or habitatsare likely to be adversely affected and to determine if consultation isnecessary. Biological assessments are only required for major constructionactivities. An agency may request from FWS a list of species that may bein the area of concern. This process is only required within the biologicalassessment process but can be requested for any action. The FWS is to providesuch a list to the agency within 30 days.4. An ``informal consultation'' is an optional process between a Federalagency and FWS and is designed to assist the Federal agency in determiningif formal consultation and/or a conference are required. 5. A ``formal consultation'' is the process in which a Federal agency firstdetermines if an agency action such as pesticide registration ``may affect''a listed species or its critical habitat. If ``no effect'' is determined,the process concludes. If there is a ``may affect'' determination, thenthe agency initiates formal consultation with FWS which describes (i) theaction, (ii) the specific area(s) affected, (iii) any species or criticalhabitats that may be affected, (iv) how the action will impact the speciesor habitats, (v) any cumulative effects, and (vi) any other relevant information.The FWS then concludes the formal consultation within 90 days, unless extendedby mutual agreement. Within 45 days after the conclusion of the formal consultation, FWS issuesa written finding called a Biological Opinion to the Federal agency. Duringthis 45-day time period, the Federal agency may request a draft of theOpinion primarily to analyze the reasonable and prudent alternatives. Thiscannot extend the 45-day period by more than 10 days unless an extensionis mutually agreed upon. The Biological Opinion should include a summary of the information on whichthe consultation is based, and a discussion of the effects of the actionon the listed species or critical habitats, including a FWS determinationon whether the action is likely to jeopardize the continued existence ofa species or result in the destruction or adverse modification of criticalhabitat. Incidental take of species for which there is a ``may affect''but is not likely to be jeopardized, will be identified. If possible, FWSwill identify reasonable and prudent alternatives to the action, such asmodification of the use of the pesticide, that the agency or registrantcan take to avoid jeopardy. In addition, the Biological Opinion will identify(i) the amount or extent, if any, of acceptable incidental take of thespecies, (ii) reasonable and prudent measures to the action that will minimizethe impact, (iii) terms and conditions to implement the reasonable andprudent measures, and (iv) procedures to handle or dispose of species taken.The FWS can also provide conservation recommendations that the agency mayor may not consider. Issuance of the Biological Opinion terminates the formal consultation process.If the Federal agency cannot comply with a Biological Opinion, it may applyfor an exemption under section 7 of ESA. 6. A ``reinitiation of consultation'' is required if (i) incidental takeis exceeded, (ii) new information is obtained which may affect the assessment(s)of species or critical habitats in a manner not previously considered,(iii) the action is subsequently modified and causes an effect to the speciesor habitat not previously considered, and (iv) new species or criticalhabitats have been designated that may be affected by the action. B. The EPA'S ``May Affect'' Determinations Ecological risk from pesticide use is a function of toxicity and environmentalexposure (Ref. 1). This Unit summarizes risk assessment procedures usedby EPA and indicates how these standard procedures are adapted for determiningwhether a pesticide ``may affect'' listed species. The EPA evaluates dataand risks in a tiered fashion. The first risk evaluation is based uponlaboratory toxicity and environmental fate data. If the initial evaluationindicates a significant concern, then EPA requests registrants to supplyadditional laboratory and/or field data in order to refine the risk assessment.1. <T3>Toxicity evaluations. </T3>Data used in assessing toxicity includeacute and chronic test data. For acute toxicity, EPA evaluates LC50 andLD50 tests, which are submitted in response to EPA data requirements (40CFR Part 158). The LC50 is the statistically derived estimate of the concentration(median lethal concentration) that would cause mortality to 50 percentof the test population. In contrast, the LD50 is the statistically derivedestimate of the single dose (median lethal dose) that would cause mortalityto 50 percent of the test population. Both tests are conducted with surrogatespecies that are used to evaluate the potential risk to other species.To assess acute toxicity of pesticides to birds, EPA guidelines requireone LD50 study for an upland game bird (preferably bobwhite quail) or waterfowl(preferably mallard duck) and one LC50 study for each species. To assesstoxicity to aquatic species (fish and invertebrates), EPA requires LC50studies on a warm water species (preferably bluegill sunfish), a cold waterspecies (preferably rainbow trout), and an invertebrate (preferably <T3>Daphnia magna</T3>). Toxicity to non-target mammals is initially assessedby considering LD50 data for laboratory rats, which EPA requires to evaluatepesticide hazards to humans. Typically, EPA requires data on honeybeesto address the risks to beneficial insects. The acute toxicity data described above are basic requirements that aregenerally available for all pesticides with outdoor uses. For some kindsof pesticide uses, or where these basic data warrant additional data, EPAmay require higher tier testing. Higher tier acute data may include toxicityto estuarine fish, invertebrates, and oyster embryo larvae; and oystershell deposition studies. Chronic toxicity data are all higher tier andmay include data on avian reproductive effects, fish early-life stage toxicity,chronic toxicity to mammals and to freshwater fishes, estuarine fishes,and invertebrates. Rarely are data from field studies, aquatic pond studies,or secondary toxicity studies available, although such data recently havebeen required for some pesticides. The EPA validates all data using itsStandard Evaluation Procedures (Refs 2 through 24). 2. <T3>Environmental exposure. </T3>Data used for the exposure assessmentof a pesticide include (1) its physical/chemical properties; (2) environmentalfate data, including data on persistence; (3) label information such asapplication sites, rates, methods, and timing; (4) bioconcentration; and(5) factors related to the species themselves, such as their biology, ecology,and distribution. Occasionally, field residue data applicable to non-targetspecies are available. The exposure assessment has two components. The first component is thedetermination of the EEC's that may result from use of the pesticide accordingto label directions. The second is a determination of whether non-targetspecies are expected to be exposed to the EEC. The EPA uses various models to determine EEC's to evaluate the risk toaquatic species. Whenever possible, actual field study or residue dataalso are reviewed. The models used include (a) a water model, (b) a simpledrift model, (c) a simple runoff model, and (d) a computer runoff and exposuresimulation model. Computer based models include the Simulator for WaterResources in Rural Basins (SWRRB) and Exposure Analysis Modeling System(EXAMS). The EPA is working on conversion of existing SWRRB scenarios touse in another computer model, the Pesticide Root Zone Model (PRZM), andother models to make more accurate predictions of drift and runoff loadingto adjacent terrain and water bodies, and drift from ground level applications.To determine EEC's for listed terrestrial species, EPA estimates residueson food items consumed by the species. Estimated residues, primarily onplants and insects, are based mainly on studies by Hoerger and Kenaga (Ref.25), and Kenaga (Ref. 26). These studies utilize actual pesticide residuevalues for several types of vegetable material, such as long and shortrange grasses; leaves and leafy crops; forage crops; pods containing seeds;and fruit (cherries, peaches, grapes, citrus). Residues are given on thebasis of a pesticide application rate of 1 lb/A and then adjusted for thelabel rate. The estimates represent maximum expected residues for day zero(immediately after application), accompanied by upper and lower confidencelimits. When possible, actual validated residue data also are considered.In estimating the environmental concentrations, EPA also considers theformulation of the product, such as liquid, granular, or fumigant formulations.The available validated pesticide and environmental fate data are usedin the computer based models to provide more accurate assessments frommultiple applications, as identified on the label. Specific scenarios havebeen developed for runoff from specific crop sites, as well as environmentalconcentrations in a pond-stream environment. Data, such as water chemistrydata, are often insufficient to accurately run the more sophisticated computerbased models. The EPA is attempting to develop additional scenarios toaddress additional use sites, different application methods (aerial, ground,etc.), cropping practices (no-till, strip crop, rotation, etc.), applicationtechniques (band, in-furrow, side-dressing, etc.), and integrated pestmanagement practices so that alternatives can be identified that will protectlisted species. 3. <T3>Risk assessment. </T3>In assessing the risk to non-target species ingeneral, EPA compares the toxicity information with the EEC and then determinesthe likelihood that non-target organisms will actually be exposed. Comparisonsof LC50 or LD50 values with EEC's indicate whether additional data maybe required or that a particular pesticide may warrant restricted use classificationif actual exposure may occur. When evaluating impacts to federally listedspecies, EPA does not rely solely on the LC50 or LD50 end points sincesome listed species may not be able to withstand even the loss of a fewindividuals in the population, much less 50 percent. Therefore, more stringentcriteria have been developed to provide greater protection for populationsof listed species, whose numbers in many instances are dangerously low.Thus, criteria were developed to determine the environmental concentrationsat which a pesticide ``may affect'' a listed species. These criteria weredeveloped for mammals, birds, and aquatic organisms as follows:<ITAG tagnum="15">mammals_EEC equal to or greater than  1/5th the lowest mammalian acuteoral LD10 or LC10, or 1/10th the lowest LD50 or LC50; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">birds_EEC equal to or greater than  1/5th the lowest avian acute oralLD10 or subacute dietary LC10 or 1/10th the lowest LD50 or LC50; and </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">aquatic organisms_EEC equal to or greater than 1/10th the lowest aquaticLC10, or 1/20th the lowest aquatic LC50.</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">When the above criteria are exceeded for any relevant taxa, the magnitudeof the potential impact is determined by calculating a hazard ratio, whichis the ratio of the EEC (based on a specific application rate) over thetoxicity criteria. Any hazard ratio of one or greater confirms that a ``mayaffect'' situation exists, since the predicted residues in the environmentare equal to or exceed the amount of the pesticide that could be hazardousto the species. Higher hazard ratios indicate a greater magnitude of concern.For most currently registered pesticides, ecological impacts from acutetoxicity are more likely than those from chronic toxicity. However, EPAalso considers information related to subchronic and chronic risks, reproductiveeffects, and bioaccumulation factors. The laboratory test data (e.g., chronicfeeding, life cycle, oncogenicity, or reproductive studies) on no-effect-levelsor no-observable-effect levels (NOEL) and/or effect levels are comparedwith estimated or actual field residues. When these residues are in excessof the NOEL for appropriate surrogates of listed species, EPA considersthat a ``may affect'' situation exists. Secondary hazards are associated with acute and chronic toxicity relatingto bioaccumulation of a pesticide in the food chain and body residues oftarget or non-target organisms consumed by organisms higher in the foodchain. Again, estimated or actual residues in food items are correlatedwith diet of the non-target organisms and compared with the acute and chronictoxicity values. In evaluating the risk from pesticide use, EPA also considers other information.For example, toxicity to non-target insects, such as honey bees, is importantbecause pollination can be critical to certain listed plants. Any reportsof pesticide incidents involving non-target species, even if they are notlisted species, also are considered. Finally, effects on listed species' habitats and food supply are also considered.For example, the Everglade snail kite feeds specifically on the apple snail.Therefore, any disruption of the apple snail's habitat from pesticidesor pesticide toxicity to the apple snail itself may adversely affect theEverglade snail kite. Also, herbicide disruptions of animal and plant communitybalance also could adversely impact the habitat or micro-habitat of listedspecies. For example, herbicides are unlikely to be directly toxic to thevalley elderberry longhorn beetle, but they may destroy the elderberrytrees in which the beetle lives. On occasion, pesticide use may be beneficialto some species' habitats by reversing adverse plant competition trendsthat have been exacerbated by other human activities, such as exotic introductionsand wildfire control. When all the data are evaluated and ``may affect'' determinations made,EPA assembles all of the relevant information and/or references, alongwith any reasonable and prudent alternatives that are known, and sendsit to FWS requesting consultation. The species and pesticides includedin this request are only those where a ``may affect'' determination wasmade.Following receipt of the request for consultation, FWS prepares the BiologicalOpinion and determines if the use is likely to pose jeopardy to the continuedexistence of a species, if the use will result in the destruction or adversemodification of critical habitat of a species or if incidental take isanticipated and provisions are necessary to minimize these impacts. A ``mayaffect'' determination by EPA may not result in a jeopardy determinationby FWS or result in any anticipated incidental take. C. Threshold Application Rate Estimates  Some pesticides (e.g., certain ones that have been subject to Special Review)have been evaluated enough that the application rates that would resultin a ``may affect'' determination are already known. For other pesticides,EPA will first screen them to determine if the highest application ratewould result in a ``may affect'' determination. Pesticides that do notexceed the ``may affect'' criteria are dropped from further analysis. Forpesticides that do exceed the criteria at the highest application rate,EPA then will determine the EEC that would result from an application rateof 1 pound active ingredient per acre (lb ai/A) for various combinationsof application methods and formulation types (and environments, where appropriate)of a pesticide. Typically, EPA then will compare the resulting EEC's totoxicity to obtain a hazard ratio. A hazard ratio of ``1'' or greater indicates that the EEC has met or exceededour ``may affect'' criteria. If using 1 lb ai/A application rate resultsin a hazard ratio of less than one (indicating the ``may affect'' criteriahas not been met at that rate), the ratio allows EPA to calculate the highestapplication rate that would still not result in a ``may affect'' determination,which may be compared with product label rates. This is accomplished by multiplying the 1 lb ai/A application rate by thereciprocal of the hazard ratio. For example, if the hazard ratio is \1/5\based on a 1 lb ai/A application rate, the application rate which wouldresult in a ``may affect'' determination would be 1 lb ai/A andmultiply;5/1 or 5 lb ai/A. The same procedure applies even if the hazard ratio isgreater than 1. However, the application rate derived in the latter casemight not be a rate specified on the label in which case all label userates would result in a ``may affect'' to listed species. <ITAG tagnum="84">VII. Public Record and Solicitation of Comments  </ITAG>A. Public Record  The EPA is providing a 90-day period to comment on the Notice. Commentsmust be received on or before October 2, 1989. All comments and informationshould be submitted in triplicate to the address given in this Notice under``<T2>ADDRESS.</T2>'' The comments and information should bear the identifyingnotation ``OPP-36168''. Information for which a claim of CBI has been assertedwill not, however, be placed in the docket. The EPA has established a public record (public docket andplusmin;36154)for the Endangered Species Protection Program. The public record includes:1. This Notice. 2. The March 9, 1988, Notice (53 FR 7716). 3. Documents and copies of written comments submitted to EPA in responseto the March 9, 1988, Notice. 4. Transcripts of the public meetings held in the spring of 1988. 5. Other materials related to the Endangered Species Protection Program.B. Solicitation of Comments  The EPA invites comments on any aspect of the proposed Program. The EPAspecifically welcomes comments on two issues. First, EPA solicits commentson the generic labeling approach, as opposed to one in which the labelsidentify the names of the counties affected (county-specific labeling).Second, EPA encourages comments on means to effectively implement use limitationsfor outdoor uses by homeowners. A discussion of these two issues is containedin the Units that follow. 1. <T3>Generic labeling versus county-specific labeling. </T3>In the March9, 1988, <T4>Federal Register </T4>Notice (53 FR 7717), EPA proposed county-specificlabeling, which meant that affected products would be labeled with a precautionregarding listed species and a list of counties in which Bulletins wouldhave to be obtained. All counties included in the Program as a result ofBiological Opinions were to have been listed on the label, and only thoseindividuals using pesticides in those counties would be required to obtaina Bulletin and follow the use limitations specified in the Bulletin. Bulletinswould contain county maps and/or habitat descriptions showing the currentlyoccupied habitat of the listed species and would describe the use limitationsnecessary to preclude jeopardy to or reduce incidental take of the species.In this Notice, EPA is proposing a generic labeling approach. (Refer toUnit III.B.) Labeling of an affected pesticide would instruct users ofthe product to comply with the use limitations that may be contained ina Bulletin for the county where the pesticide is to be used. Although alist of counties would not appear on the label, Bulletins would be specificto a county. For counties with no use limitations, Bulletins would providegeneral information about protecting listed species. There is one significant difference in design between the two approachesdescribed here. The difference is that in the county-specific approach,users of pesticides would know from the label if a Bulletin would applyto their county. In the currently proposed generic labeling approach, itwould not be apparent from the label if a Bulletins applies to their county,but if it does, the user must follow it. Thus, the second approach willmake it potentially more difficult for users to know whether their particulararea is affected since the counties will not be listed on the label. Under either approach, there would be no difference in the area actuallysubject to use limitations. Only persons using affected pesticides in thecurrently occupied habitat of a species for which a Biological Opinionspecified protective measures would be required to follow the use limitationsin the Bulletin to ensure that their actions will not pose a threat tolisted species. The EPA recognizes that there are certain trade-offs as a result of thisdifference. County-specific labeling would be more convenient to users,since it would be readily apparent where special instructions applied,and it would avoid the potential inconvenience of users having to determinewhether use limitations applied in their county. Generic labeling wouldbe more convenient to registrants because labels would have to be changedinfrequently. Generic labeling would provide EPA with some administrativeadvantages, but would require more efforts to develop additional Bulletinsand inform users of the existence or lack of use limitations in a county.County-specific labeling would likely delay protective measures for addedspecies during the time necessary to relabel products.In the proposed Program described in this document, EPA intends to re-evaluatepesticides with existing Biological Opinions declaring jeopardy and toreinitiate consultation with FWS where warranted. As a result, EPA doesnot yet have specific information on which pesticides and species willbe included in the forthcoming enforceable Program. However, based on theProgram that EPA intended to implement in 1988, a total of 910 counties(approximately 30 percent of the counties in the United States) would havebeen affected. Under the initial proposal, all users of affected pesticidesin these 920 counties would have been required to obtain a Bulletin orin the case of mosquito larvicides and forestry products, place a telephonecall to the FWS; no actions would be required for pesticide users in 70percent of the counties. With generic labeling, pesticide users in theseunaffected counties would be required to know if there are use limitationsand to follow any that are applicable. The EPA believes that the advantages of generic labeling exceed the advantagesof county-specific labeling for several reasons. Once labels carry therevised language, they would have to be changed only when all use limitationsare deleted for a pesticide product. Because of the time needed for registrantsto produce new labels for affected products and the time necessary forproducts with old labels to clear the marketplace, relabeling a productto provide effective protection takes approximately 2 years. Under genericlabeling, addition or deletion of a species from the Program as a resultof new or revised Biological Opinions would be reflected through revisionof Bulletins and could be made more rapidly than through requiring labelchanges. Similarly, no label changes would be required to accommodate state-initiatedplans, changes in reasonable and prudent actions or revised assessmentsof particular use sites. The use of Bulletins in unaffected counties alsomay sensitize pesticide users to the need to protect listed species, thuspromoting the use of the Bulletins when and if use limitations become necessary.During the first few years of the Program, many changes in affected speciesand affected pesticides are likely as EPA and FWS evaluate and assess currently-registeredpesticides. Because of the cost savings associated with generic labeling,industry may be cooperative in assisting with public outreach activitiesto inform pesticide users where use limitations do and do not apply. Ifgeneric labeling is adopted, EPA will explore various means, includingthe possibility of a toll free telephone number, for the convenience ofpesticide users to assist them in determining whether their pesticide usesite is in an affected county. The major disadvantage of generic labeling is that users of affected productsin all counties would have to become aware of whether any use limitationsto protect listed species existed in their county. Because the Bulletinscontaining the use limitations may change as often as annually, pesticideusers would have to determine if there are any changes each year. The EPAis concerned that users in initially unaffected counties may become apatheticto future limitations in those counties and cease checking to determinewhether they are subject to use limitations if they have checked for severalyears and found none. User opposition to the Program may result, whichcould lead to decreased user compliance. With county-specific labeling,the existence of use limitations in a particular county would be clearas a result of listing the counties on the label. To provide further analysis of generic versus county-specific labeling,EPA will estimate the impacts to pesticide registrants and pesticide usersunder both implementation scenarios by quantifying the costs imposed onsociety. Under generic labeling, pesticide users would have to take thetime to determine if use limitations apply in the county in which theyplan to use the pesticide. This factor will be analyzed in terms of thecost of additional time. In contrast, county-specific labeling would imposeadditional label modification costs on pesticide registrants, but may costthe user less time. The EPA plans to weigh the increased opportunity costof time for generic labeling against the increased label modification costsof county-specific labeling. The ability of both approaches to disseminateinformation to the user community and thus reduce the risk to listed specieswill also be considered in the analysis. The EPA is especially interested in receiving feedback from users on thesetwo approaches, since user understanding and acceptance will be criticalto the success of the Program. EPA thus solicits specific comments on genericlabeling versus county-specific labeling.2. <T3>Methods for implementing use limitations for homeowners. </T3>The ESAmandates the protection of listed species in their habitats, which caninclude urban, suburban, and rural areas. Home and garden products maybe used in all of these areas and may expose listed species. The EPA believesthat to fulfill its obligations under ESA, it is not appropriate to differentiateamong agricultural users and household users when either may expose a listedspecies through pesticide use. The EPA thus believes that it is essentialto include products labeled for home and garden use that ``may affect''listed species. The EPA is proposing that home and garden products usedoutdoors not be exempted from the Program. (Refer to Unit IV.2.f.). The EPA recognizes that there are differences in the nature of some ofthe pesticide products used by homeowners. In its review to determine whethera pesticide ``may affect'' listed species, EPA will consider that areastreated by homeowners are typically smaller in size and thus less likelyto result in widespread environmental concentrations that may be detrimentalto listed species, especially where transport away from the site of applicationis necessary to expose the species. The EPA will also consider the applicationrates and methods, and the concentration of the active ingredient in theproduct when estimating EEC's. Only if the EEC exceeds the ``may affect''criteria (refer to Unit VI) will EPA refer the pesticide to the FWS fora Biological Opinion. In the Biological Opinion, the FWS will considerthe proximity of use of the product to listed species habitat. While EPA believes the factors it considers in determining whether a pesticide``may affect'' listed species, and the FWS procedures for developing BiologicalOpinions will result in minimal limitations on home and garden products,EPA will continue to seek measures to further limit the burden on thispopulation of pesticide users. The EPA specifically requests comments onother factors it may consider to reduce this burden while continuing toprotect listed species. The EPA also recognizes that implementation of the Program for homeownersmay require very different methods. Users of home and garden products arerarely certified applicators and, therefore, would not have undergone certificationtraining, which is a major means of educating and informing agriculturalusers of pesticides. The EPA solicits specific comments on means to reach and inform users ofhome and garden products about any use limitations to which they may besubject. At present, EPA expects to use the labeling/bulletin approachfor home and garden products, but is open to alternative approaches. Withany approach, EPA continues to seek suggestions on means of communicatingeffectively with users of home and garden products. <ITAG tagnum="84">VIII. References </ITAG>With the exception of the studies by Hoerger and Kenaga (Ref. 25) and Kenaga(Ref. 26), which are published in the scientific literature, all referencesare available from the National Technical Information Service (NTIS). Ordersmay be placed to NTIS by telephone at (703) 487-4650 or by mail to thefollowing address: National Technical Information Service, ATTN: OrderDesk, 5285 Port Royal Road, Springfield, Virginia 22161. The references used in this document are as follows: (1) U.S. Environmental Protection Agency. 1986. Hazard Evaluation DivisionStandard Evaluation Procedure for Ecological Risk Assessment. EPA 540-9-86-167.NTIS No. PB86-247657. (2) U.S. Environmental Protection Agency. 1985. Hazard Evaluation Division.Standard Evaluation Procedure Wild Mammal Toxicity Test. EPA-540/9-85-004.NTIS No. PB86-129251. (3) U.S. Environmental Protection Agency. 1985. Hazard Evaluation Division.Standard Evaluation Procedure Avian Dietary LC50 Test. EPA-540/9-85-008.NTIS No. PB86-129293. (4) U.S. Environmental Protection Agency. 1985. Hazard Evaluation DivisionStandard Evaluation Procedure Avian Single-Dose Oral LD50 Test. EPA-540/9-85-007.NTIS No. PB86-129285. (5) U.S. Environmental Protection Agency. 1986. Hazard Evaluation DivisionStandard Evaluation Procedure Pesticide Spray Drift Evaluation: DropletSize Spectrum Test and Drift Field Evaluation Test. EPA-540/9-86-131. NTISNo. PB87-102216.(6) U.S. Environmental Protection Agency. 1985. Hazard Evaluation DivisionStandard Evaluation Procedure Honey Bee_Acute Contact LD50. EPA-540/9-85-002.NTIS No. PB86-154580. (7) U.S. Environmental Protection Agency. 1985. Hazard Evaluation DivisionStandard Evaluation Procedure Honey Bee_Toxicity of Residues on Foliage.EPA-540/9-85-003. NTIS No. PB86-129244. (8) U.S. Environmental Protection Agency. 1985. Hazard Evaluation DivisionStandard Evaluation Procedure Acute Toxicity Test for Freshwater Fish.EPA-540/9-85-006. NTIS No. PB86-129277. (9) U.S. Environmental Protection Agency. 1985. Hazard Evaluation DivisionStandard Evaluation Procedure Acute Toxicity Test for Freshwater Invertebrates.EPA-540/9-85-005. NTIS No. PB86-129269. (10) U.S. Environmental Protection Agency. 1985. Hazard Evaluation DivisionStandard Evaluation Procedure Acute Toxicity Test for Estuarine and MarineOrganisms (Mollusc 48-Hour Embryo Larvae Study. EPA-540/9-85-012. NTISNo. PB86-129335. (11) U.S. Environmental Protection Agency. 1985. Hazard Evaluation DivisionStandard Evaluation Procedure Acute Toxicity Test for Estuarine and MarineOrganisms (Estuarine Fish 96-Hour Acute Toxicity Test). EPA-540/9-85-009.NTIS No. PB86-129301. (12) U.S. Environmental Protection Agency. 1985. Hazard Evaluation DivisionStandard Evaluation Procedure Acute Toxicity Test for Estuarine and MarineOrganisms (Shrimp 96-Hour Acute Toxicity Test). EPA-540/9-85-010. NTISNo. PB86-129319. (13) U.S. Environmental Protection Agency. 1985. Hazard Evaluation DivisionStandard Evaluation Procedure Acute Toxicity Test for Estuarine and MarineOrganisms (Mollusc 96-Hour Flow-Through Shell Deposition Study). EPA-540/9-85-011.NTIS No. PB86-129327. (14) U.S. Environmental Protection Agency. 1986. Hazard Evaluation DivisionStandard Evaluation Procedure <T3>Daphnia magna </T3>Life-cycle (21-Day Renewal) Chronic Toxicity Test.EPA-540/9-86-141. NTIS No. PB87-209730. (15) U.S. Environmental Protection Agency. 1986. Hazard Evaluation DivisionStandard Evaluation Procedure Fish Life-Cycle Toxicity Tests. EPA-540/9-86-137.NTIS No. PB87-209169. (16) U.S. Environmental Protection Agency. 1986. Hazard Evaluation DivisionStandard Evaluation Procedure Fish Early Life-Stage. EPA-540/9-86-138.NTIS No. PB87-209722. (17) U.S. Environmental Protection Agency. 1986. Hazard Evaluation DivisionStandard Evaluation Procedure Avian Reproduction Test. EPA-540/9-86-139.NTIS No. PB87-209177. (18) U.S. Environmental Protection Agency. 1986. Hazard Evaluation DivisionStandard Evaluation Procedure Field Testing for Pollinators. EPA-540/9-86-140.NTIS No. PB87-209714. (19) U.S. Environmental Protection Agency. 1986. Hazard Evaluation DivisionStandard Evaluation Procedure Non-Target Plants: Target Area Testing. EPA-540/9-86-130.NTIS No. PB87-101689. (20) U.S. Environmental Protection Agency. 1986. Hazard Evaluation DivisionStandard Evaluation Procedure Non-Target Plants: Seed Germination/SeedlingEmergence_Tiers 1 and 2. EPA-540/9-86-132. NTIS No. PB87-102240. (21) U.S. Environmental Protection Agency. 1986. Hazard Evaluation DivisionStandard Evaluation Procedure Non-Target Plants: Terrestrial Field Testing_Tier3. EPA-540/9-86-135. NTIS No. PB87-101697. (22) U.S. Environmental Protection Agency. 1986. Hazard Evaluation DivisionStandard Evaluation Procedure Non-Target Plants: Vegetative Vigor_Tiers1 and 2. EPA-540/9-86-133. NTIS No. PB87-102224. (23) U.S. Environmental Protection Agency. 1986. Hazard Evaluation DivisionStandard Evaluation Procedure Non-Target Plants: Growth and Reproductionof Aquatic Plants_Tiers 1 and 2 Test. EPA-540/9-86-134. NTIS No. PB87-102232.(24) U.S. Environmental Protection Agency. 1986. Hazard Evaluation DivisionStandard Evaluation Procedure Non-Target Plants: Aquatic Field Testing_Tier3. EPA-540/9-86-136. NTIS No. PB187-101705. (25) Hoerger, F.D., and E.E. Kenaga. 1972. Pesticide Residues on PlantsCorrelation of Representative Data as a Basis for Estimation of Their Magnitudein the Environment. Environmental Quality. Academic Press, New York I:9-28.(26) Kenaga, E.E. 1973. Factors to be Considered in the Evaluation of theToxicity of Pesticides to Birds in Their Environment. Environmental Qualityand Safety. Academic Press, New York II:166-181.<ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: June 21, 1989.    </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Victor J. Kimm, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Acting Assistant Administrator for Pesticides and Toxic Substances.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-15579 Filed 6-30-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6560-50-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>